Now comes the date bag, why can’t a girl just go out, and when I say a girl I mean me, why do I have to look like I’m going for a 10 day vacation and not just a night out.
I’ve almost finished making a quilt for Wills room and quite by accident this little row of houses matches perfectly so I think I’ll be framing it and putting it up on Wills wall when the quilts in there.
June 2006 so does Alabama
Cartridges used: A Child's Year (Name), Graphically Speaking (Butterfly - lower left), Tinkerbell & Friends (Butterflies - 2 on the right)
- How can you carry so many mixes?
2) Keep a close on all belongings: Be aware of your surroundings and keep a close eye on your tickets, wallets, purses and other belongings at all times.
The HPLHS' mission is to create time-period-appropriate-but-modern-audience-acceptable props and materials based on the work of Lovecraft. The Whisperer... is an ideal example of what they do. The movie is presented as a film that could have been produced and released in 1931, the same year the original story "The Whisperer in Darkness" was published, but I'd argue that it would probably be more at home in the mid-30s as films like Frankenstein and especially Dracula were a bit "stage-y." Nies' score is a bit more "full" than the scores from this time period's films, but none of this distracts or detracts from The Whisperer.... In fact, this is one of the strengths of the HPLHS, Sean Branney and co-writer Andrew Leman - they know when to bring just a touch of modern sensibility into their work to make the work accessible to modern audiences. (That's not to cast a negative light on the film at all!)
Fran Sheehan-Bass/Backing Vocals
#068 Tim Hudson (A's)
Echoing in my mind
After that I will send for many hunters,
When I managed to tear myself away from drooling over the EJO's I moved onto the needlework section where to my delight I found a copy of Averil Colby's Samplers. I also indulged my Virago/Persephone addiction with copies of R.M Dashwood's Provincial Daughter, Marghanita Laski's Little Boy Lost & Emma Smith's The Far Cry (in a wonderful vintage Penguin edition)
Construction of The Great Buddha was begun in 743 and was completed in 752. My guidebook mentions that Emperor Shomu ”ordered the building of the Buddha as a charm against smallpox”, and I read elsewhere that its construction was meant to focus national interest at the new capital of Nara. Whatever the reason for its construction, it is awe-inspiring to be in its presence. When I saw it, I was astonished. It was more impressive than I had imagined. Also, I had a sense, gazing at it, that I had never expected to see it. I have seen the image of this statue for decades, in many different contexts, and it didn’t occur to me when I was planning to come to Japan that it was here and that I would see it. I had a similar feeling when I saw Notre Dame in Paris and the Coliseum in Rome—a voice inside me said Really? I’m really seeing this? Wow!
Rounding out the Unchosen 3 are Casey Abrams and Haley Reinhart. I bring them up together not because they’re my new all-time favorite Idol power couple (though they are), but because they’re an interesting contrast for me. On one side we’ve got Casey, who has been a favorite of mine since day one (proof you ask? check who’s numero uno with an asterisk in my auditions guide!). He started strong and he’s been consistently solid throughout the competition. He isn’t afraid to take chances, even after they blow up in his face, and why should he be? Even on his worst nights, he’s still got the best ear for music of almost anyone in the competition. Like Jacob, Casey has gotten some crap for his over-the-top antics, especially his tendency to pull crazyface and growl during songs, but I for one love it. Boy can sing anything and he’s got a great sense of humor. What’s not to love? Case(y) in point:
And now for the goodies. I posted the Guided Reading observation form we use a while back. We make lesson plans and store them on index cards so each teacher can share them. This form is for us to record specific things we notice as we are working with each child. It helps when you are trying to identify specific skills to work on with students. Click on the picture to head to that post.
If it were so, it was a grievous fault,
One thing that I always find difficult about watching the movies of books I have loved, is that when I read, I tend to picture what I am reading in my head….It is almost like I am the director of my own personal movie. I create in my mind what the scenery and characters look like (with the help of the authors words) and I imagine the words coming to life.
While I have now come to terms with them, even find the humour in them, I still want them to be less noticeable. So when I was given a bottle of Bio-Oil, I thought, why not make it a Bio-Oil Challenge? On the bottle, it says that if you rub the oil on your body, twice a day for three months, in circular motions, the marks will become less noticeable. The stretch marks will never go away and results vary from individual to individual, but the product claims in time, they will fade.
These straight friends and allies overcame the homophobic bullshit they'd been told, opened their hearts, and looked at sexual minority people as we really are. So did several Republicans in the State Senate, though they'd been pressured most intensely under the assumption that they'd vote "for family values.' None of them had to do this. I therefore want to pay it forward by helping others.
Always, always, always send a thank you letter after meeting with an employer for an interview of any kind. Most job seekers do not do this, and better yet it will set you apart. Handwritten is most impressive but, let’s be honest, if you don’t have the best handwriting an e-mail may work. Try to hand write whenever possible, and send one to every person who participated in the interview process.
”A close third” he opines. ”Tree Rats, or Sciurus caroliniensis. Very smelly with a propensity to shin up trees and throw nuts at us”.
coconut macadamia nut shortbread
That concludes the General Zinni portion of this post. But, regarding decision-making, taking action, and risk-taking, I wanted to bring General George S. Patton, Jr. into the discussion. To hit upon each of these topics, below I present General Patton’s philosophy -
Too soon for some, anyway – timing is truly everything.
Protection for the wealthy, defence of privilege
Now that I look at it again, reminds me of some sort of.... creature. This is one of those tangles that needs a bit of practice before I can do it justice.
184 Ninth Avenue
Maybe some one knows about Brenda E. Spender and can educate us.
I had to admit they'd been fashioned by a fellow who didn't know a hammer from a soup spoon but had had good intentions, nonetheless. J's son came in while we were cleaning up the mess we'd made. He took one look, turned on his heel and returned minutes later with a couple of sturdy boards and his electric drill. In two minutes he'd braced the second set of shelves on the opposite wall. They just may may make it through the summer without mishap. thanks to his know-how.
Without getting myself overly nonsense and too exaggerated, I need to end my review now. All I'm saying is this book was great. Much better than the last book, and definitely much exciting. It's a page-turner, you won't be able to put it down. This book surpassed the previous two books in the series, and I can't wait to read If I Die. The series is getting more exciting and engaging... It was definitely worth reading.
He got a green sticker.
There is a week left to avail yourself of the SNB sale at the moment... I hope you'll get it before it's gone!
Just look at that cookie! Melt-in-your-mouth perfection.
The Ohio FFA Convention starts tomorrow. And we have great news. You can take a peek at their sessions live, online at www.ihigh.com/ohffa.
I would go to more places where I've never been,
The news and picture came from a web posting in Baidu’s discussion forum: Family planning authorities in Moshan town, administered by Linyi city, Shandong province, forced a 9-month pregnant woman into abortion. According to the post, the baby “even gave a cry when it came out.” The family, on hearing the cry, went over to see the baby, before it stopped crying or breathing. Doctors pronounced its death.
Well this is a tough one. Dealer in the early days seems to have been a lot more customer oriented, but seems the approach now is you tell me the figure you want to spend and will try to get you a vehicle or tell you how much more you need spend (never how much less).
The wheel in the sky keeps on turning. It keeps going around and around and around. It goes around and around, many times. Because of course it is turning – continuously - As in - not stopping - Ever. Or in a sense – never –as in it never stops – ever: never ever, ever never. It is not entirely clear if the wheel is progressing forward, or simply spinning in a stationary fashion on its axis. But we know, with certainty, that it is going around and around. It, the wheel, keeps on turning…
*sprinkle of cold water
While you're cooking you can get the kids to sample the tofu, meat, noddles, cucumber and sprouts. They might even try the whole dish.
That was really quite something and an experience we will never forget, standing up there in the spring sunshine, watching those magical islands diminish. My memories of the day are like a kaleidoscope, glistening with sun filled jewels:-
A Presidency source said the President might consider the call for Azazi’s sacking as a ploy by some northern to get one of their own back to the office.
- It confuses the mission of the church with maintenance of the status quo (that is, it equates the former with the latter) - and the status quo that was assumed in the mid-1970s is very far from being a healthy assumption to make about the church in the 2010s.
Albarn has also appeared on other unrelated works. His song "Closet Romantic" appeared on the soundtrack for Trainspotting alongside an early Blur recording, "Sing". Fatboy Slim's 2004 release Palookaville featured Albarn's vocals on the song "Put It Back Together". Albarn provided the voiceover intro and backing vocals in the song "Time Keeps On Slipping" for the rap concept album Deltron 3030, and featured on the track "Lovage (Love That Lovage, Baby)" for the Lovage album Music to Make Love to Your Old Lady By. Both albums were produced by Dan the Automator, who also produced Gorillaz' debut album. Albarn also composed the score with collaboration by Michael Nyman for the 1999 movie "Ravenous" with Guy Pearce and Robert Carlyle. It is described as "an eerie mix of symphonic orchestrations and clunky ragtime" which went arguably well with the movie's cannibalistic themes. In 2000, he composed the main part of the soundtrack for the crime comedy Ordinary Decent Criminal.
This show is absolutely hilarious.
And now with a closer look at the bands.
When I was in Hawaii I stumbled across the best booth at the local farmers market! They were making a ton of ginger flavored drinks. I don’t know if I mentioned it, but last year I completely gave up soda. I used to be a diet coke girl, drinking 1-2 diet cokes a day. Now days I hardly drink soda, with the exception of Ginger Ale and Fresca.
Today children are either moving back in with their parents or else they are being funded by them (if not a wealthy grandparent). They don’t have to grow up, so they take unpaid internships, sleep late, party a lot, travel. Which is better? I don’t know, but I am happier that I grew up when I did. Given the choice though, I think I would have preferred to be born in the 1930′s, when it was easier to get jobs and to make a lot of money if you were driven to do so. So many incredible people now cannot pay their bills even if they do get jobs.
Consider this replacement headline: “New football coach energizes players and deflated program.” Less ambiguous and more informative, this headline answers questions without posing them itself.
Delaware's claim to fame, other than the beaches, is that it was the first of the original 13 states. The postage stamp on this card commemorates statehood and the bicentennial of the ratification of the Constitutional Convention, which gave birth to the governing bodies of the USA.
Don´t ask me to define freedom, it´s such a spectacularly grand concept, just realise we don´t want to be tyrannised like the Europeans.
Translated from the Spanish by Nancy Cunard.
Co-operation means very little if it only means co-operation with people who already agree with you, are malleable or will do as you say.
Mark Charan Newton is the author of the genre bending Legends of the Red Sun series, which started quite strongly with Nights of Villjamur (reviewed here). It is a world of the far future that has the feel of a Fantasy with some magical-like technology. Newton's stories often play with themes of sexuality and society at war with itself while also mixing in Epic style strife of evil politicians and an invading race of monsters bent on the local populations death. The second in the series City of Ruin is one of my favorite books of the last couple of years that ups the world by leaps and bounds from an already high point. Newton's latest The Book of Transformations has just been released in the UK and as a kindle book in the us while the first two books in the series are now available in the US as trade paperbacks.
Blue shirted chap: “We’re not a cult, we’re a family.”
Sooo wat funny things have i seen i hear you ask.....well lets see......
My experience with heathenry lead me to my Lady Freyja. The goddess dancing in the golden sunlight of her own glory, the sexual drive of the cosmos, the tendency of two things to become one in order to become or create a third. The joy celebrating existence. The lover seeking out the ecstasy she once had and has lost. The utter feeling of loss at no longer feeling that ecstasy. The passion of the body, the dancing of the bodies flying through the cosmos, the tango of the aurora borealis. All these things are Freyja, and these are what I worship.
MADISON
Lena Horne, “What Is There To Say?”
*The Serradura I had was frozen.If you want to do that, freeze the dessert and then leave it outside 20 mins before serving time.It is absolutely delicious this way! It melts in your mouth. I also sprinkled some cocoa powder over the last layer of biscuit,for an effect :-)
Leave a comment on my blog + become a follower or confirm that you already are a follower. If you post about my challenge on your blog, come back and leave a second comment leaving me the link, you will have a double chance of winning!
Stamps, brad and pearls: Kaisercraft
Will Bentley show up to ruin the fun?
by AWR Hawkins
God, it is said, works in mysterious ways. How else to explain this previously unknown symbiosis between the gathering of religious insight and the sale of dairy products?
Hello, my stamping and blogging friends. It is with a very heavy heart that I make this post today. My Granny has had many struggles with her health in the past couple of years, and she gave up her fight at 5:15 this morning. I believe with all my heart that she is enjoying her special place in Heaven at this very moment. Those of us who were blessed to have this amazing woman in our lives were truly blessed with an angel here on earth. I scrolled back through my blog posts to find this entry I made in April of 2009, when I first started taking care of Granny after she came home from the hospital. This is such a comfort to read this and remember...
So this year I decided to focus on training pilots who were already signed off with their "novice" rating, but were looking for more guidance and information. I was approached last summer by a couple of pilots about this option, and this year decided to go ahead and DO IT! I put a note up on my website and started working on my plan.
Pre-heat oven to 325 degrees. Grease each cup of mini-cheesecake pan. Set aside.
While the peace process was conceptualised to have several components — transitional justice, property return and land reform, democratisation of the Nepal Army (NA) — it has come to largely refer to the integration and rehabilitation of 19,602 former Maoist combatants of the People’s Liberation Army (PLA) in regular discourse.
Suggestions must not entail removal of clothing.
I felt that the officer was exceeding her lawful authority, so I made a complaint to the Independent Police Complaints Authority, who referred the matter to Derbyshire Constabulary's Professional Standards Department for investigation following the local resolution process..
First of all we would like to welcome the very talented
#1 that I definitely have a weakness for children's picture books....especially ones with beautiful artwork and/or meaningful messages. I hope my kids will never outgrow me reading to them.
Sick leave language generally limits accrual above 100 days
Plus the whole world’s turning brown and who cares?
Dear Heavenly Father, thank You for making Your Word available to me. I declare that I’m increasing in knowledge and understanding, and Your Word is producing in me what it talks about. I have the mindset of a victor for Your Word is at work in me mightily, in Jesus Christ Name Amen!
This picture is one I took at the Minnesota Ren Festival this last season. Apparently it is VERY popular among viewers. I has 111 hits.
So feel free to keep reading about our lives here, but you will need to seriously lower your expectations of how frequent I'll be updating. I can't promise more pics will be up on Facebook either . . .
The Music
Today my Marcus is eight years old! Josh and I were in the room when he was born eight years ago and I was the first person to hold him. I love this kid. :)
If we don’t like the outcomes we are currently getting, there are two choices we can make:
Rings out an angel sound
Here is the inside of the card:
Before my bout of design depression, I started a Hipster Kitty Bingo card. This image does not accurately portray the finished product (I want that to be a surprise) but there will be a cat, some hipster wordage, and a ball of yarn. I want him to be less flat…
I like and don't like the BB liner. I find it kinda difficult to get a solid line of color without having to go back a few times. But the good thing is the liner really stays on for tight lining, but strangly it doesn't stay on well for regular lining on the upper lashline.
But no matter how much Najib spends on PR and imagery, his days as a first-tier politician are numbered. Even if he wins GE-13, he will lose the Umno presidency and have to make way for his deputy Muhyiddin Yassin. Chances are higher that their BN coalition will be wiped out by the Pakatan Rakyat led by Opposition Leader Anwar Ibrahim.
Dan found a new sewing machine that he thought I would just have to have... and I did! I love it...
More speakers followed, and I continued to sit quietly, listen and understand how to participate.
*I’d rather not explain how, when and why.
The song over, I turn to the girl next to me in the crowd and ask who the band is.
‘Just one moment’ and he’ll be gone
So the FA Cup semi final at Wembley against Everton, a season defining game we are lead to believe, as if doing well in the rest of our league doesn’t matter.
Falls into the sea.
Young birds resemble the female, but are paler below and have buff feather fringes. Both sexes have a sharply pointed bill. The tail is of medium length and is rounded. The eyes, bill, and feet are all black.
So you are a bit more disciplined in that respect compared to the rest of the band?
Level 9: MP Cost: 36, Duration: 114 seconds, Damage: +18%, Critical Rate: +13%, Minimum Critical Damage: +5%, Attacks up to 1 enemy.
Using this data, giving the President the consistent 10 states, the “Fantasy” Map (versus the ABC Official Fantasy Map (ABS Does Not sure the Word Fantasy, but given the fact that the news organization has about as much chance as accurately predicting the outcome of the 2012 general as, well, a blogger using Gallup approval rankings in 10 states) - the map looks a bit more like:
I am not one for making new year resolutions, but this year I decided to try my hand at a few. After some reflection I have decided to start with just a handful of resolutions. I am not making a lot of resolutions, but here are some I believe I can keep:
If you do follow your bliss,
- Extra quart of oil
Normally I abhor kitsch in all its forms, but George Sanders is such a compelling figure that, when I saw this LP in the dollar bin of an otherwise unremarkable record store in Austin, Texas, I picked it up.
He talks some more. And more. And more.
Here's another example of me playing with the faux washi tape. I really like how this turned out. I totally scraplifted it from a card I saw on Pinterest, found here. She has some GREAT cards.
Carl Jung
Eventually we started belting out songs from the eighties. Stephanie knew all the words, while I just sang the words I thought I heard, since I have a terrible memory for details like song lyrics.
“He heard her become distressed then say: ‘Get off, get off, what are you doing!’ He heard her scream for 30 seconds before her line went dead.” Jallat can be seen on the footage adjusting his clothing as he flees. The pair appeared “elated” and Shahzada made “bowling” motions like cricketer as the pair ran off, their celebrations were captured on CCTV.”
With the folks behind him in line laughing hysterically, the man glared at the Virgin attendant, gritted his teeth and said, 'F... You!'
Wishing you all warm smiles... and a great weekend...
las vegas lights
Unless, it's Dooce that is writing GOMI....or maybe it's the husband.
Armed with a new state law, the city has spent the past year cracking down on the growing industry of short-term rentals; since the law took effect last May, nearly 1,900 notices of violation have been issued at hundreds of residential buildings.
1 strand-like
2. Dream! This is the fun part! Search for some inspiration!! This can be found anywhere, such as a TV show (think HGTV), a catalog for your favorite retailer, Home & Garden magazines and of course, never underestimate the power of the internet. A simple Google search for "Organized Office Spaces" should do the trick. I also like to visit sites that are dependable pro's in organizing, for inspiration, such as: MarthaStewart.com, RealSimple.com and TheContainerStore.com.
Welcome to Lovebug Scrapbooking's "INSPIRE US!" blog hop!! Our blog hops take place on the last Saturday of every month. Thanks so much for joining us! If you just happened by this blog and didn't realize a blog hop was taking place, please go back to Lovebug Scrapbooking and start the Hop. You won't want to miss all the inspiration from our members....... or the prizes :-)
I am a professional illustrator, although currently unpublished. I've sent in portfolios to publishers and had reasonably positive feedback so far - many of my submissions have been kept on record for future use. However, I've recently been contacted directly by someone looking for an artist to illustrate their poetry (it's fun and quirky in style and I believe I could compliment it well with my art). I'm not quite sure whether they intend to self-publish or submit the "final work" to an actual publishing house...either way, though, I've read time and time again that author/illustrator duos will NOT be accepted by publishers, regardless. Is this always the case? Even if the art is of a very high quality? I'm feeling a little out of my depth as this situation is all new to me and I'm not aware of the standard expectations of the illustrator either through a publishing house or in a self-publishing situation. Any information you can enlighten me with would be very, very welcome!!
All in all I give them 3 stars out of 5.
Project Chickens before the Eggs, or Who Needs Prozac When You Have Chickens?
Reuters: KARACHI: Plates staged protest against Karhai’s statement regarding torture due to scrubbing.
You leave, and the night becomes
3 Maximalist 3:20
Could things be changing again? Perhaps not to that vitriolic level of the 1970s, but growing apprehensions about India is something worth observing. In the infrastructure sector, Indian consultants in various PPP projects have caused consternation. In the telecommunications sector, Airtel was not universally welcomed. There are grumblings about the way the government has borrowed from India, or on the transit issue. This op ed in Prothom Alo, hardly an anti-Indian newspaper, could be the harbinger of things to come.
A novel set in a posh Dublin school is a far cry from the worlds of Roddy Doyle’s Barrytown or Dermot Bolger’s Finglas. Did you deliberately choose a radically different social setting with “Skippy Dies?” Or was this a purely instinctive, natural narrative backcloth? Well, I didn’t choose it just to be different. It was a world that I knew very well, which had the added attraction of having been somewhat under-represented in Irish books. In fact I had the suspicion, rightly or wrongly, that that world, the ‘posh school’ as you call it, and the boring, anonymous suburbs where so many people live now, weren’t seen as being worth writing about. They were seen as being less ‘Irish’, less authentic and therefore less fit subject for literature than more ‘real’ settings like the west of Ireland, for instance. That idea, that some places and some people are more real than others, and that we should all be writing novels about old peasant women scrubbing their butter churns, really bothers me. Maybe the suburbs are less real and less authentic. But the people living there are still people, and their experiences of this unreal world are absolutely real. So I wanted to write about that world I knew so well, and I wanted to write about it via teenagers – they’re the ones who experience suburbia most directly, because they’re stuck there. And again, teenagers seemed to be seen as kind of infra dig in Irish novels, so I wanted to give them their turn.
Those at Chicago’s rally said they welcomed participation from the Occupy groups. ‘I definitely see it as an enrichment of it,’ one organizer Orlando Sepulveda said. ‘It’s great.’
There are other tricks to employ here too, and I'm sure some of the comments will give you some additional good ideas.
It originates from the Christian God. That refutes your absurd claim of "which god?" also. As if you didn't know. Because, as you well know, it is the Christian position that God has revealed Himself to all mankind so that we can know for certain who He is. Those who deny His existence are suppressing the truth in unrighteousness to avoid accountability to God. It is the ultimate act of rebellion against Him and reveals the professing atheist's contempt toward God.
Stamping Dragon Designs:
One of my favorite quotes of all time is from President David O. McKay, “During courtship keep your eyes wide open, but after marriage keep them half shut!”I was married to my first husband over 25 years ago. I felt very old because of looking back and finding that instead of encouraging changes within myself during that marriage and to encourage it within him; we did fail through each of the 3 steps listed. In doing so, instead of finding the good in each other and encouraging each other, we sharpened #3.
I haven't blogged in a long time. Don't know that I want to write out long stories right now. I'm going to switch things up and just start posting little snippets of life with Yan, my thoughts, etc. I often post these on facebook, but would like to keep them somewhere where I can have more of a record of things. I want to remind myself how good my life is and how blessed I am to have a funny little girl in it each and every day.
We went to lunch at Hillary's Boat Harbour and shared a really yummy pizza at a place called Caesar's before moving over to San Churro Chocolatier for dessert. Then we had to go home and just lay around so we could digest our food before heading out for dinner! lol
Across a fairly long bridge. (2 miles--it seemed long)
The fruit of the Spirit has always been, and will always be, the outcome of a life submitted to the Holy Spirit.
We've talked about lots of things, as he cannot move much at all and we have nothing but time to watch tv and shoot the breeze. One of the things we talked about was the old addage: "What doesn't kill you makes you stronger".
Costing and pricing for Profit
To say to you till the end of time
To begin, I embossed a #8 manila tag with the Stripes Texture Fades folder. After embossing, I applied Peeled Paint, Broken China, and Walnut Stain Distress Inks to the raised areas of the tag using an ink blending tool.
You’re not much of a hipster, yet your mismatched clothes
Hromnik also supports my own theory that a race of sea-faring people with a Hindu culture (Indians) from the Asian continent arrived on the east coast of Africa and Mosambiek in search of gold, and that these Asians used their own advanced technology (and superior minds) to design and build the various stone structures that have been discovered in the Mpumalanga region. Hromnik also wrote a book on the subject called, Towards a New Understanding of the History of Sub-Saharan Africa. More detailed notes and comments by these two gentlemen can be viewed online in the archives of Rapport. Take note that the report is written in Afrikaans.
My forty-six year old sister has a pacemaker. She came through the minor surgery no problem. From a cardiac perspective? They are ready to discharge her from the hospital.
This is all a bastardization of the original story by Gogol, whose protagonist was Russian, a Protestant. His son marries a Polish girl, a Catholic, during the religious war between the two countries in the 1600's, and the Russian father simply kills his son to eliminate the shame.
This time he landed
I am completely incapable of listening to anyone say anything positive to me. Just the other day someone told me that I was a “beautiful girl, and smart and logical” My response was the same as always I roll my eyes and dismiss it. I want to take these words in but my wall around myself is so strong that those positive words bound right off of my façade and fall at my wayside. On the other hand any and all negative opinions hit me like an atomic bomb shaking me right to my core. I am more easily hurt then complimented and I never feel worthy of praise. I make myself my own worst enemy and that needs to stop. I have an aunt that recently has criticized me for some things that appeared on Facebook and the fact that I like to enjoy a cigar from time to time. As much as I try to put this aside I find myself revisiting it daily. To the point that I have had to decline and invitation to my cousin’s graduation because I can’t face her knowing that she has these negative opinions of me.
I get to leave at like...5:30 in the morning. BAH. BAH.
- The bathroom is equipped with an oversized shower, double sinks, and bonus! A separate vanity.
Fishy you've won it with:
Greeks have returned to an old way of obtaining services and things – bartering. The Greek town of Volos, adopted a formal way of bartering which involves a currency called the Local Alternative Unit, or TEM in Greek.
First off is an archive pic from March when I took Shasta to get a video of her. Its my stock trailer. I have to use an archive cause right now its in the shop getting new u-bolts and bearing and brakes and lights. Will almost be like new when I get it back (hopefully this week) This trailer has been used to haul cattle, horses as well as for moving and many many other things, its just a handy size.
So, here is the scary part:
- Growth is a neuromuscular reorganization.
I have sought to remove the financial incentives and conflict from the Family Court so there would be very rare need for Solicitors, Barristers and social services there!
That's why the weekends are the BEST.
gently and tenderly
Arguably the main subject of this short read is hunting, with Hemingway chronicling the events of an African hunting trip he took with his then wife in 1933, which some modern readers will find unpalatable. I didn’t think the hunting would bother me but at times I was aware of the sheer senselessness of the activity particularly when Hemingway was butchering rhinos and lions for no other reason that the thrill of the chase and the trophy at the end of it. Hemingway himself said that he never felt bad about killing the animals but he didn’t like making them suffer.
After the blood and the lamb: beets
Later, Mildred is taken home in a police car. Veda comes rushing out to greet her, and Mildred hollowly tells her she’ll have her new piano the next day. Justifying her behavior yet again and giving in. Well done, Mildred. You’re the worst parent ever.
Approx prep: 25 minutes Bake: 10 minutes (mushrooms) Serves: 5
CRONJE GEORGE 48, 2010-06-02 Komatipoort Limpopo; Sandvik colleague Charles Slabbert, 45, injured http://censorbugbear-reports.blogspot.com/2010/07/george-cronje-48-shot-dead-komatipoort.html
“Yeah,” I agreed. “That’s all we need; and I’m sure that will be another story.”
When Little A and I started this journey, I claimed it was in part because I wanted to prove people who said I was crazy for hitting the road for two weeks with just a toddler and no one else was crazy. I wanted to know that I could take just about anything as a parent and preserve my sanity.
That’s nothing to the billonaires who own the companies (why)
Catching Fire by Suzanne Collins
DINING OPTIONS
Batch Size 5 gallons
Love you.
Game Jersey
board of the Jesuit Georgetown University’s Center for Strategic and
I didn’t even see another paper in any of my afternoon classes. In fact, I didn’t see any more papers at all. Until I walked out of school at the end of the day.
The distance between them disappeared. My father yanked her to her feet. His hand drew back. "And who the hell are you? You can't even hold down a job."
Time magazine calls Weaveworld “an irresistible yarn,” and Peter Straub says it is “pure dazzle, pure storytelling.” This 25th anniversary edition of Weaveworld will undoubtedly be the one to own and experience.
he came back a perfect infection unit.
In exactly one week it will be my birthday and the thought passed through my head to come back and dance that evening. But who knows what the future will bring? I decided to live for the present and celebrate tonight as my birthday and to enjoy the dance now.
I know you've all been dying of anticipation on this one, so without adieu, on to the results:
2 tbsp of fresh lemon juice.
When asked about the fires in Sumatra and Borneo which may have contributed to the drop in air quality, Hishammuddin said that his intelligence officers did brief him about some foreign element in BERSIH.
LIKE our page and stay tuned in for updates and give-aways during the two weeks of Exhibition. Please feel free to pass on the invitation to your Family & Friends and bring them along!
That plausibility somewhat lessens when Hepinstall has Iris run away with the slaves. Her flight and her siding with the slaves to spite her husband is the crime that puts Iris in the asylum. As I researched slave resistance for my dissertation, I never once came across anything like this. Nowhere did I find a white plantation mistress running away with her husband’s slaves. In Hepinstall’s story, Iris runs away because she sees herself as their mother-figure, just as many slave owners viewed themselves as “fathers” to their slaves. Iris feels responsible, at least in part, for their plight at the hands of her husband.
The Holy Spirit led Jesus out into the wilderness right after His baptism by John. Jesus’s time in the wilderness was a necessary part of his preparation for ministry. Quality leaders can almost always point to a wilderness experience as part of their leadership preparation. Why? What is so important about the time in the wilderness? Because being alone in the wilderness sucks! However, during this time, our motives get purified, our backbone solidifies, and our calling gets clarified.
While we were walking around the campus, we heard music from somewhere. We tried to walk to the source of music but coulnd't really pinpoint the location. It seemed like the sound was coming from the other side of the street so we went back to the car and took the car to find this location.
Who - Everyone (worldwide) is welcome. No experience required.
In a dark world where vampires exist and where Source Blood, a rare human blood type, can bestow godlike powers upon them, the vampire Venators of the Sovereignty fight to protect the humans by banishing those who drink it to the endless dark.
This is huge for about twenty-seven reasons. The farther reaches of the Republican and Religious Right have been saying many disobliging about gay people lately; Mitt Romney even let a spokesman go, apparently because of his sexuality. North Carolina recently added an amendment against same sex marriage to its constitution. There appear to be some people who genuinely believe that homosexuality is the work of Satan. I do not think they are being metaphorical.
It's been far too long since I've uploaded anything here. I just haven't been inspired to make anything, and when lately when I did get inspiration I find I don't have the blocks I need. I have every pixelblock color except light yellow and dark blue, and the pixelblocks company is seemingly going dark. Their website has slowly lost features (Digital Stained Glass, then the store where you could order individual colors) and currently just displays a "coming soon". I'm hoping this just means they are scaling back their web presence to focus on other things, but I fear the worst.
Friday, November 4: 2:00 pm – 5:30 pm
My clock just hit 3:42 a.m. as I post these Big Blue Thoughts. In nine hours and seventeen minutes, the New York Football Giants and the Philadelphia Eagles will square off in an epic battle for the right to sit atop the NFC Eastern Division. I'll get a few hours of sleep, but the truth is I'm all fired up.
I made her say it again. ...will be able to walk... I swear there were angels dancing around us in that moment. The relief and joy overwhelmed me.
Dorion - “Somewhere” feat. B Rad & Jenny
One of the country roads near Dorrigo NSW, along this road we found a farmer selling organic potatoes - Dutch creams and Kipflers. We bought a bag for eating and a bag for planting.
Then yesterday at the park I saw her take her shoes and socks off, put the socks inside the shoes and place them all in the bag on the back of the buggy, before climbing into the sand-pit. Only the day before she had come running to me to help her take off her shoes.
Natural health practices are popular because of their short term and long term benefits. There are number of natural health therapies available: Electro-magnetic radiation and bio-field protection, Reiki, Message Therapies, Spa, Yoga, medication, meditation, ayurveda. A new sense of well-being, with natural health care practices can be gained.
How to Read a Poem: Beginner's Manual
To celebrate Earth Day, the company I work for arranged to have a few environmentally friendly cars available for anybody to test drive at work. The cars that they had brought over were:
Donohue tries every trick in the book and it all goes so horribly bad for him because he happens to be talking with someone who was themselves a victim of rape by a Catholic priest and who is incredibly well versed in the damning report of abuse in Ireland schools.
And so it begins.
A whole lot.
Sprawling edifice.
So I plan to train for a backpacking trip. I'm not sure what trail, or mountain yet. I'm looking into what might be a safer hike for a couple of girls (my friend will be going with me) As we look into it and start getting ideas I'll share.
Enjoy the remainder of the weekend everyone!
This isn’t the greatest pic – but it works for me. My c’ankles are GONE, and I can definitely see the difference. That said, there is still the issue of ‘Mucho Mas Grande Queso’ going on. But at least in clothes, everything appears to be falling right into place.
But this soul will not judge
'What is Shag doing?!'
Travelco based in South Africa for training of staff of the agency.The
And, instead of apprehension and tension as they approach adolescence, I am in awe of the people they are, and of who they are becoming. Rather than power struggles and battles and resentments building over time, we have a relationship built upon cooperation and respect, and two children who are growing in their ability to consider others, and two parents who are learning to do the same...
14. build the sickest library.
Mr Rose cut a cool figure last night, reclining on the stairs of his new venture, resplendant in a ye olde epicier blue coverall, while Paris's fooderati flapped about him.
The truth is that sometimes God's gifts don't come in neatly wrapped packages with a bow on top...sometimes they come in pain and heartache and day by day I am learning to accept the gifts He gives no matter the form...even when they don't feel like it...His gifts are good. I can honestly say, knowing what I know now, if given the choice...I would still choose having Isaac and Asher even knowing I would not get to keep them...the love and blessing far outweighs the pain...the pain has been a pathway that has opened my eyes and heart to so much and for that I m so grateful.
if I am to tired to cook. What is up with that?? I decided it would be a great time to try
⅔ cup Dijon mustard
3: thick as a brick part II (with drum solo) 14:43
The other night, I was going to make cookie bars, but since I like the dough so much, before adding the egg, I decided to just eat the dough. Yum!
The Paper Shelter is offering our lucky winner a fabulous prize - visit The Squirrel and The Fox blog for details. I hope you'll join us, I look forward to seeing all your Summery creations. For inspiration, make sure you check out what our DT have created, they continually amaze me with their work.
Next weekend, the clocks will go back in the UK which means that the days will seem even shorter, light will be at a premium and I’m sure we’ll all be eager to make warming winter food!
Here are the eight demands of Bersih 2.0 to refresh us lest we forget:-
It is extremely important to a man that he can trust you to teach the children right from wrong, and the Christian faith, especially when it goes against your compassionate feminine nature. I have actually seen this done, where a mother understands parenting and child development so much that she won’t yield to a screaming disobedient child because he has to learn the habits that will see him on to a Ph.D in physics. What’s even more fun is when she explains to you why she’s doing it, and where she studied it. That what makes a man happy.
imagine, and in a fraction of a second, a drunk driver had taken all this away from him. Now you
The point of this particular post is to look back at 2011 and pick out what changed in your life; the negative and the positive.
Our dinner last month, though, was hard for me. I may or may not have broken down into tears at my favorite restaurant. Being there with my friends made me realize how much I miss them. And how much of them I miss out on. There is WAY too much catching up on each others' lives. I wish I just knew what was going on. They both knew what was going on with each other. It was just me who didn't. I know they live in the same town and get to see each other more, but I hate the feeling of being the odd man out. Not that they leave me out. It's just how it is. I don't live there. It can't be helped. I can accept that, but I don't have to like it.
High temperature K/T/BMH & K/T/BEH Hermetic condensing units using Bristol compressors are NO LONGER AVAILABLE as catalogue items and have been removed from NROES. Users with quotes for units using Bristol compressors should have them switched to an alternative model.
“I was riding in my car. Jasmina Henley was with me, she was only about five or six then, and we were on our way to the market. We passed Ferne on her bike near the old gas station down near the curve. Ferne waved. I remember exactly what she was wearing—babushka, mittens, sweats, down jacket. By the time I got down the hill and made the turn towards Cottonwood, the ambulance was already on its way up the hill. I remember thinking, I hope that wasn’t Ferne.”
say my name
Every photo needs to be processed. Even basic processing can take 10-15 minutes a photograph and some of Mary’s photo art can take upwards of an hour per photograph. If you want to make great photos, you need processing software including Photoshop, Light Room, and plug-ins. Having a suite of software options is like having more tools in your tool belt. They all cost money. When we get back from a trip with a 1000 photos, we need to review each one, often a couple of times. We will process 100-200 photos, but only print and/or publish 50. We also have tested many different papers and printers before we found a few we liked. Again, it takes time and money to invest in the best output.
(BTW Can someone please explain to me the point of a decaff espresso??)
Past woes troubles and fates I see
My teacher Miss Windsor had an aunt named Elizabeth Windsor. The older Windsor taught in Miriam too, and she was a terror teacher. Her nickname was Det, but people called her Death Windsor behind her back. There were rumors that when Det died, she came back to life after three days. In the province, they don’t embalm people because they believe that souls return after three days. Sounds familiar? In Det’s wake, she woke up, scared the hell out people in attendance, except for her daughter.
Really? Did we win? Where's the parades? When did the Taliban and Al Qaeda surrender? Was there a victory celebration?
I'm gonna be holed up in my workroom finalising the wardrobe and auditioning actors for the next 2 months. We are shooting end of March! Yusssss!
Hope Roberson
The Fine Arts of Relaxation, Concentration, and Meditation: Ancient Skills for Modern Minds
Like I said, it depends on your definitions of "largest", "most powerful", and "gun".
Many do not choose to go, many people don't even make the choice to send their kids, they just do it...How can compulsion be a choice?
Shutter speeds (or exposures) are measured in fractions of seconds such as 1/1000, 1/50, 1/15 etc. Exposures which are slower than 1/60 of a second require the camera to be perfectly still, if not you will have a blurry image. Some cameras will allow you to set your exposure in full seconds from 1 second all the way up to 30 or more seconds. With night photography, we will need to keep the shutter open for several seconds.
OMG I cant believe it! I just realised now that my cardigan, blouse and shoes have never been worn! How funny that I chose to wear them all together today! The colours I chose to wear were all warm tones with hints of pink and gold. In all honesty I would have preferred a brown skirt but I don't own a skirt in that colour! So my new mission is to find a skirt in a lovely brown tone! The feature I love most about my skirt is the interesting stitching on the front and uneven hemline. Some skirts can get a little boring so this skirt really appealed to me. I added a bright blue silk scarf to my black bag to lift the overall look and I chose to wear nude shoes to make my legs appear longer then they really are :) My vintage glass bead necklace was a last minute choice. I was initially wearing a pearl necklace but just as I walked into my garage this morning I changed my mind and swapped it for this one.. Something a little different.
Brighton is one of the UK’s most famous seaside towns – it’s quite large so it’s probably a city – on the South coast of England, around an hour from London it’s the place where capital dwellers desperate for a more laid back lifestyle tend to decamp. It has all the charm of a Georgian seaside set up with all of the sophistication demanded of a crowd used to the delights of London.
Some educators say that a cell phone is disruptive. I’d rather have a cell phone go off any day than the stuff that goes on in my classroom each day.
Made my way across the room, and thus from several cravat lengths, I caught her gaze. ‘Twas a moment of momentous note. Her eyes offered both an invitation and a challenge, a welcome and yet a curt dismissal. Then, no sooner than I had shaken myself back to some form of composure, she swished her way into another room. From thence to the punch bowl, there fortified myself in preparation for my advance. Thence onwards to the next room wherein I noticed The Lady of the Fans being apparently bored by a well known popinjay and a laughable prick-me-dainty. Advanced towards her and met her gaze. Feeling it acceptable in so decadent an environment to dismiss the need for a formal introduction, introduced myself. Viz, by title, not alias. She looked at me, still challenging, and yet with a subtle hint of invitation.
I had a list of people to phone and also some commission bids - usually the Sage puts those in his book, but if there's something complicated, such as someone wanting to spend no more than a given amount altogether, or alternative bids (that is, if they aren't successful in the first lot they bid for then they'll bid for another, but only want one piece) then I take it on. It went fine, I didn't miss anyone and several of my customers were successful, but I managed to forget to hold up the bidder number every single time and Weeza had to ask. D'oh, darlings, d'oh. It must be extreme old age and decrepitude.
With “Someone I Used To Know” scorching the charts, getting the Glee treatment, and racking up millions of YouTube views – it was no surprise that his recent Saturday Night Live appearance also featured a skit with Andy Samberg and Taran Killam doing a nude parody of the famous video. According to Gotye, the idea of the skit at first made him a little nervous – thinking he may embarrass himself – but he shook that off thinking, “What? What an idiot like this was going to come up as an opportunity ever again!”
These guys are making some of the most exciting beers in the country at the moment and if you come across them I heartily recommend you give them a try.
Tickets to our 1st Anniversary Party & Market are $20 and will only be available through online, pre-sale. The price of the ticket includes entrance to and use of the brewery grounds, parking, a spot on any or all of the tours and a souvenir glass. The sizes of our free sample pours will be reduced from our normal tastings so that guests can sample all of the nearly 20 different artisan beers we’ll have available.Tickets are available for purchase. Congrats JK!
The race had over 30,000 people running in both the half and the full, but the pre-race area was well organized, and there was coffee, bananas, water, and bagels on hand. The gear check-in went smoothly. The one major issue was that there were clearly not enough portapotties. We joined a line at 5:45am as we had nothing better to do, and did not get to pee until an hour later. After peeing we headed straight to our coral, and only just made it for the national anthem. There were hundreds of people in the line after us.
They are a tall plant, ranging from 1–5 ft (30–150 cm) in height. Their branching stems produce glossy deep green leaves that taper to a point on each end, and grow up to 5 in (12.5 cm) in length. The peony root is brownish in color and tuberous.
But it hasn’t.
I've almost forgotten how the internet works and in logging back on, I see that most of my social networks have changed their formats, making them social notworks. As I have rejected and ignored electronic devices, I've mused over the elegance of delay. I've day-dreamed about circumstances where no immediate response is required or desired. I've wanted people to call me no sooner than when urgently moved to do so. The cellphonics have worn me down to a stubble of indifference. Don't text me. If you must leave a message, preface it with "this message has been mulled over and impact-considered for hours." Or better yet, write me a letter that begins with, "Dear Kass, I carried this missive for days in my breast pocket. It leaned earnestly against my heart and now I say to you that the weight of its impact has worked on me, causing me to spill out with....." (then say something loaded with caffeine).
Where other times I’ve said it bold
It is a good idea to talk with your doctor before beginning an exercise program.
I’m confused by the directional pad allowing to change the 3D effect at least in Mario Land…which one am I supposed to use?!? The manual doesnt even mention this option.
A van filled with people was being escorted by a car suspected of serving as a spotter. Law enforcement thought the van might be smuggling people or drugs. Presumably the people would be illegally in the country. A high-speed chase ensued. The driver lost control when it entered the city of Casa Grande and crashed through a wall striking several trees in a yard. Of the 11 people crammed in the van four died while the others are injured and hospitalized. No one in the article is identified as being illegally in this country though there is a final note that upon their release from the hospital they would likely be turned over to the Border Patrol. We, of course, will be paying their medical bills.
Flour, salt and pepper and oil
I've been bad at keeping up on this. I think the Old Wive's Tales about gender are fun. We're not going to find out the gender early with this one so instead I'm doing as many tests as possible to see which ones are "accurate" with this baby.
It has been two months since my last post! Time really flies. I've been extremely busy in non-sewing related activities and lots of things have happened. But I hope to be back at a more regular pace in the new year.
Factoid: this album was later re-issued and credited to The Living Voices (with different artwork).
So as you can see the original image is perhaps well lit, but doesn’t have the punch that advertisements really need to have. Advertisers want something that is really going to jump off the page. I mean think about it, if you’re flipping through a magazine even with the coolest advertisements the most you do is take a glance go, “Cool,” and to the next page you go. For that reason, if you have a mediocre image that doesn’t catch the viewers eye, the chances are you aren’t even going to stop. I knew I was going to have a lot of post work that needed to be done because 12 inch frosted glass bottles are not the easiest to light.
The pungent oranges and bright, green wings
This also requires leadership that is capable of explaining to the soldiers why they have to do this – why they have to do something totally counter-intuitive.
Fortune Seekers are flooding the megacity Bombay daily from the various provinces. Many of them are living and working at countless large construction sites in the city.
Michael Sfard, an attorney with Yesh Din, which reportedly advocates Palestinian rights, described the request as “an announcement of war by the Israeli government against the rule of law.” More specifically, “they said clearly that they have reached a decision not to evacuate illegal construction on private Palestinian property.”
patience; and let not the prospect of death ever cause us any fear, but may
- who to trust? ('Those fossil diggers can be an untrustworthy lot!' lol! So it's not just the eco world that is full of iffy types and odd sorts?!:)
In total, 4,600 properties, which can be found on their property portal, Casaktua.com, are being promoted with an average price per square metre of 638€, “the same as the average cost per square metre in our country in 1992, according to figures from the Ministry of Development.”
- Federal Wire
Please offer her your love and support in this horrendous time.
These were super easy to make, and took about an hour to do. Anyone can do this! These letters add a great personalized touch to her nursery and takes it from out of the box nursery and turns it into a really cute and custom nursery.
I love teaching. Eventually I would love to teach as a professor. I loved substitute teaching for elementary schools.
…Even though they were talking about church and God, they were both aware of the underlying current. They were inches away from each other across the table and the heat they both seemed to be generating was beginning to set sparks flying.
I'm going to be doing a radiation therapy five days a week on the tumor in my lung for now, enhanced, we hope, by a once-a-week chemo treatment. When they did the CT scan to set up the radiation treatment it appears that the tumor may have actually grown since the last scan in February. Its completely taken over the center lobe in my right lung. The lymph node which showed no signs of cancerous activity has doubled in size. The tumor is squishing some of the arteries and so radiation is going to be very precises as to not damage my heart.
When sexual selection is weak, the adaptive equilibrium is dominated by selection for a dull, cryptic appearance that reduces detection by predators (Kirkpatrick, 1987). As sexual selection grows stronger, the equilibrium shifts toward a more noticeable appearance that retains the attention of potential mates, typically by means of vivid and/or novel colors.
Good sense is destined to fade
The Girl of Fire and Thorns by Rae Carson
In introspection: I glanced at my watch and confirmed my suspicion. I'd slept too long and now I was two hours late for my date.
The point of all of the above is to show and record a crucial era in attitudes to children, reading and children's literature in the Victorian era. As we move across the pond to the United States, while our puritanical standards would likewise rear up to shout down literature deemed "inappropriate", there was a much larger middle and lower class and a smaller "cultural elite" calling the shots on a population consisting, even more so by the end of the century, primarily of diverse immigrant backgrounds. Cheap publications like those spearheaded by Street and Smith starting in the 1850's would provide adventurous respites for children. Tip Top Weekly debuted America's first continuing fiction hero, Burt L. Standish's Frank Merriwell and others would follow suit as comic strips, comic booklets, dime novels, pulps and eventually comic books (as we know them), provided the middle and lower classes with cheap, sensationalist reading material.
“. . . Douglas R. Stringfellow . . .had won the First District seat in 1952 largely through his stirring tales of heroism during World War II. Stringfellow had become paralyzed while serving with the U.S. Army Air Corps in France, but he began embellishing his war story as he retold it to Scout groups and young people's gatherings until he had invented his participation in a dangerous Office of Strategic Services (OSS) mission behind enemy lines, an officer's commission, and several faith-promoting incidents in which his life was saved. Not only did Stringfellow share his story at dozens of meetings but the stories were also repeated by Mormon Church leaders and written into church lessons for young people, and he was honored by the U.S. Junior Chamber of Commerce as one of the top ten young men in America. His election to Congress in 1952 showed the strength of his popularity, but during the 1954 campaign his fabrication unraveled, and under pressure from the leadership of the LDS church and the state Republican Party, he confessed and withdrew from the campaign.
But -
and the schemes of the wily are swept away. Darkness comes upon them in the daytime;
My starter baby is leaving me in just a few short months. He is leaving me, to go learn how to protect and defend all of you.
“Everybody Sees the Ants,” A.S. King (Little, Brown Books for Young Readers)
Creating Full Length Movies With Your Flip Video Camcorder
I love the colour of this card, it's a gorgeous teal and I also had mirri in the same colour. The backing paper is another magazine freebie as is the
This the catwalk :)
What to include?
To which I say, what? Since when has the media been an impartial referee? Below is a sampling (and it is merely a small sampling) of quotes about the press over the past two and a half centuries. Use a search engine to find ‘Quotes “the press”‘ for many hours of more like them.
my right hand
at first he asked me about my job, which i answered patiently.
I am still chipping away at my inbox, so for anyone who may be thinking, "What? She hasn't replied to me yet??" I swear I'm getting there. Slowly. But I'm getting there.
Now with the advent of portable backyard fire pits, more and more folks are enjoying suburban S'more making sessions. Many restaurants offer dessert setup's where the patrons can toast marshmallows to make their own S'mores right from their dinner table. Heck.. I saw a toy in the store that allows kids to make S'mores on the kitchen counter top. As soon as spring arrives, I notice Jet Puff Marshmallows, Hershey Bars, and Nabisco Graham Crackers strategically displayed together in supermarket floor displays.
The MAIN main course featured Beef Bourguinon which had spent the best part of the previous day bathing in two cases of red wine before being drained, char-grilled, rested and re-heated for our dining pleasure. It matched a treat with the Mad Brewers Scribbly Gum Lager whose smoky backnotes and crisp finish mirrored the caramelised edging of the beef and cleansed the palate as well. A masterful match.
Decades later, Alan Morris feels like a failure until he discovers he is the descendant of an acclaimed, successful, heroic novelist who went down with the Titanic. Will he find his identity with the past, or will he listen to Joanna Bettencourt, Caroline’s granddaughter, who says inner peace and success come only with a personal relationship with the Lord?
Last chance workout time! Bob and Dolvett have had 18 days to come up with new methods of torture and the losers are petrified. Have I mentioned that I love Dolvett? Just making sure. He’s awesome! Bob’s attitude seems to be getting better, too. Chris has a little bit of an anxiety attack, but she’s ok after she catches her breath. Dolvett thinks Kim’s a little bit off, so he pulls her aside. She’s not sure she made her goal.
From that oddly frenetic thing, to something far more sedate, as John Williams and Cleo Laine give us Feelings.
The Establishment isn't strong, it's weak, and hated by vast sections of the population, possibly a majority as we see from the turn out figures for General Elections, and the results; it has virtually no presence at street level, it's ideas are manifestly bankrupt and it has nearly destroyed our society, our economy and our culture. They only look good by comparison to the inadequates who have led radical nationalism.
New Zealand – West Coast
But here's the home-run:
Favela 02:36
The occasion will be celebrated at INPI’s auditorium located in Rio de Janeiro. The morning will start with presentations from the like of: INPI’s President Jorge Avila; WIPO’s director in Brazil, José Graça Aranha; the coordinator of the Intellectual Property Program of the National Confederation
I've been guilty of dashing off angry, frustrated words many times, myself. There but for the grace of "Save as Draft" go I. So, trust me, I understand the urge.
Enjoy your day! xx
We sat on the rocks, trying to get out of the wind, and had our lunch before heading back.
The actual root cause of the farm murders, not only in South Africa, but in many other countries on the African continent, should become crystal clear if we examine the following carefully:
Brodhead closed by stating he was from Yale and they “have a different type of approach to sports” and that he was not opposed to a more solid emphasis on athletics as long as a university “does sports the right way.”
To this day only Joshua and Owen really know what happened, but they’ll never tell.
Have I ever mentioned that I greatly dislike our front door? I don't know why. It's got this fancy carving stuff all over the outside of it. I think the flowers might even be Tudor Roses. You'd think I'd be gaga for it. I'm not. Just one of those things I guess.
Alex Counts is president, CEO and founder of Grameen Foundation, and author of several books, including Small Loans, Big Dreams: How Nobel Prize Winner Muhammad Yunus and Microfinance are Changing the World.
to a son, congratulations”
The second half of the film is not without its problems, however. There are a few moments that feel just too convenient, including one cliché of the action film that just refuses to die: that is, the moment when the protagonist is cornered by the villain during a confrontation, and there is absolutely no possible escape, when just at the last possible moment, there is an eleventh-hour rescue by another character. How many times have we seen the set-up, for instance, where the protagonist is just about to be shot, point blank, by the villain, and when we hear the gun shot that we assume is coming from the villain’s weapon, the villain slumps over dead, and behind him we see the protagonist’s friend aiming his gun. As clichéd as this moment sounds, there is a similar moment in True Grit, and I must admit I found myself almost taken out of the film by this scene, because it’s simply such a lazy way of getting the protagonist out of danger.
( only for family visits )
However, in my opinion, the film's real star was Claude Rains as Capt. Louis Renault. His role is like the other roles, only more so. A self-proclaimed corrupt official, Rains' Louis sparks scenes with his sly wit. He could have been a villain but in Rains' hands, you can't help but love him.
cause I have never gone bye-bye in the puter.
- Mixed dried herbes de Provence
'Is Mr Malema saying that the ANC does not respect democracy and is willing to ignore the millions of Zimbabweans who sent Zanu-PF packing in the corridors of power?' asked Austin Moyo, chairman of the MDC in South Africa, at a media briefing in Johannesburg on Thursday.
My Favorite Thing This Week: There was so much happening here this week that it is hard for me to come up with just one. I think that my favorite thing this week was watching Ash, Buddy and Bella chasing bubbles in the backyard. They were all having so much fun and it took all the worries of life away for a moment.
Next up............. The sangria!
‘If it sounds like writing, I rewrite it’, by ELMORE LEONARD
“Well, all I know is that I am content with my life right now and that is what gets me by.”
I go with the flow
The Metropolitan Transportation Authority said it didn’t think twice about accepting Fitzpatrick’s campaign.
Women's duels were not as rare as you might think. One fought in Hyde Park, London, became known as "The Petticoat Duel", first they shot at each other with pistols, then fell-to with swords because of a heinous insult. -One had dared to question the veracity of the stated age of the other.
Today I'll be showcasing the release sets along with the other Paper and Such DTs in a blog hop!
Becoming influenced by other writers is inescapable, but rather than copy how they write, and cheating on your own limitations, instead expand on your own style of writing and you’ll find yourself becoming a better writer who discovers their own style and voice and sense of language in the process.
A Global Mega-Brewer Hedging Bets
Thats a lie. I have a reader for Thatha and the Magic Grain.
In a nutshell, it's written from the perspective of a 6yr old girl about her baby brother who has Down syndrome. She kept asking her dad, of the wonderful things she had planned to do with her brother, which would he not be able to do? Ultimately, there wasn't anything she had planned for her brother that he wouldn't eventually be able to do.
Wish I had been born rich
A poker rakeback room offers rake back with the important purpose of keeping their players playing at their room. A room that has been promoting poker rakeback deals for a long time is not suggested for new players to participate in that poker room. This is because new players will have hard time with competitive players. Hence, new players usually avoid poker rakeback rooms that are full of competitive players. A poker rakeback can be of very useful to players who are consistently winning. But it can also be considered as worst if new player is attending the game. Hence, new players should always learn the game first and play within a comfortable limit.
By the time we got to the hospital, Claire was in a coma and they’d put her on a life-support machine and sent us to another room. A nurse came in and told us she had bleeding in her brain. Carol, my sister, asked if they would operate. The nurse said, “Oh no, normally they don’t operate with a bleed on the brain, the person just dies.” All Claire’s relatives in the room started to cry – except for me, I was in shock. A couple of hours later a surgeon came in and said he was going to operate. Carol asked if Claire would live and he said, “Of course she will, but we’ll see what we’re dealing with at the end of it.” I could have kissed him.
Feel free to use any of these new features to broadcast your feelings about the LDS Anarchy blog far and wide. For some of you, you might be compelled to shout, “Hip, hip, hooray!” For others, “How in the world did this blog last so long and when’s it gonna die?!” Regardless of your persuasion, y’all are invited to enjoy a piece of (cyber) birthday cake.
-printer (if you have one)
A whole lot of people are gearing up for a fight. Getting ready to do battle and coming out swinging. I am standing. I have done all I can do. I have done all that is reasonable and will continue to do so and probably some fairly unreasonable. I am going to stand. I am just going to be. Here. Right now. Next week. Next month. Next year. Ten years from now. When I am old and gray. I am going to stand. Here. Right now.
"To be honest with you, there was simply something about you that compelled
public school heathens had just arrived.
I did an interview with Payne Horning from WCRD (the Ball State Radio station) that will be airing tomorrow morning, for anyone interested.
Q: What difficulties does writing this genre present?
Still got pieces of Crooked Rain floating around in my head. I think though I’m done telling you about my father. Again. For now. Such a central figure in my life. I suppose for all children, assuming your dad is around and a part of things. I know that’s not true for everybody.
I am open to any sort of suggestion, advice, connections and help. Please contact me about any questions you might have, too (tangobaby2 AT gmail.com). Whatever it is you can do, and for some, a donation isn't in the cards (I can totally understand). But even passing this post along to others you know creates the snowball I'm looking for. I've experienced the snowball effect before and because of that, I know it can happen again.
There's cardboard still to be glued, and canvas surfaces to be fixed on, gessoed to be overlaid and background surfaces to be painted. I want to make sure that these all go according to plan so that nothing interferes with the fun part and I don't get frustrated or disheartened. It doesn't take much to get us creative types all bent out of shape at the best of times, and a looming deadline for a major exhibition has a habit of sending me into a real frenzy.
Like “antediluvian” in “Calamity Song.”
7a. Now do a soft fold, YOU DO NOT WANT TO SCORE OR CREASE THIS FOLD! You're going to bring your two outside edges together as you see below, and hold it towards the base, with your thumb and forefinger so you leave a nice soft curve fold which makes the larger outside petal of the flower.
As you enter the crucial fight
And so it was, that, while they were there, the days were accomplished that she should be delivered.
However the cyber world has been gradually taking over for a while now, and its time for me to withdraw from it and get back into what I need to do.
Kwegyirba Croffie is a freelance Associate Producer at News 12 Connecticut and a Special Events/Event Planning and Social Media Intern at College Lifestyles (TM). She is a Quinnipiac University alumni and a sister of Alpha Delta Pi. She enjoy cupcakes,Broadway musicals, Forever 21 ,giraffes, peacock feathers, orchids, lillies and anything Disney.
If we desire a relationship with God and confidently expect that relationship to be realized through Christ, then God will fulfill that desire in us.
The victims claim the response unit, which is based in Nelspruit, travels all over Mpumalanga leaving chaos in its wake. People in the area call this unit "Amaberete" because of the distinctive black and red berets they don.
Tuesday I had my annual physical and the cold had just hit me on Monday after severely pruning a 10 foot bush, actually two grown together like brambles. I left the doctor's office with three new prescriptions, none of which had anything to do with my cold since it's no doubt just a virus anyway. One of the meds I just started taking to treat suspected narcolepsy is a generic Ritalin. Yeah, you know that stuff they give kiddos for ADD? Well you've heard me talk about having CADD before, right? That crafter's attention deficit disorder that makes us flitter from one project to the next and the next and the next, never completing any of them. Well it should be interesting to see how this new drug effects my CADD. I can tell you that it is keeping me awake during the day (PRAISE GOD!!!) My boss actually thought I was joking when I told him I'd been falling asleep at work, then I had to explain that I never actually slept at my desk because I always got up and walked around or did something that kept me awake, but was constantly struggling to keep my eyes open and head up. My doc said it's most likely caused by the fibromyalgia, but could also be narcolepsy. As much as I detest taking medication, especially anything with potential side effects, when something interferes with my ability to carry out daily activities and responsibilities then it's time to take action. The other one I finally succumbed to was for my high cholesterol. With my weight and family history it was time to give in and take something that can lower it.
No interactions have been reported between squawvine and other herbs or medications. Before using this herb as a remedy, however, a person should first consult with a doctor or health practitioner to discuss potential interactions.
Did you bathe in the heat of the weekend? Or were you just bathed in sweat? It felt good to get some time out in the sun. Were you able to get to some of the food truck festivals that were out and about? The week will be cooler and I’ve read that there is a possibility of rain on Thursday. You have been warned!!
The story is told about a woman Zen master named Sono who taught one very simple method of enlightenment. She advised everyone who came to her to adopt an affirmation to be said many times a day, under all conditions. The affirmation was, “Thank you for everything. I have no complaint whatsoever.”
But in Mexico, I saw the Match Boy. He was not cute.
This came from a top Marine who was at the meeting and is overseeing the financial reconstruction efforts.
1) Participate in the weekly challenges a minimum of 2 times per month (preferably 3 or 4)
I had some amazing help from some amazing friends.
Jesus will recount every kind and compassion-filled deed you and I ever did on this earth. Every act we did to help another person...even the small ones. Giving someone a glass of water or a cup of coffee. Offering a "Happy Meal" to someone hungry. Holding the door open for someone who has his or her hands full. Visiting a neighbor who is lonely or sick. Offering someone a smile and a "hello." Listening to someone who is hurting. In simple deeds, we serve Jesus.
These were drawn on wedding thank you notes I had messed up:
I'm passing my Anatomy class...barely. Totally not good enough for me.
Corruption and sin no more disprove the Catholic Church than the flood disproves the Ark.
When out the hellish legion sallied.
I have been concerned about the honey bee population since I first began to hear about colony collapse disorder. I thought that Bee Movie was a great way to illustrate what a bee free world would look like for my kids. An interesting question; are even those of us most conscious of our footprint on the world, just as guilty of ‘advancing’ these things that threaten us?
Abdulla Ahmed Ali, Tanvir Hussain and Assad Sarwar owe their claim to Britishness to a piece of paper and the malevolence of politicians. It is merely ethnic cross dressing which can be locked away when the pantomime is over, and certainly will be when we are all called to take a stand. In their genes, hearts, souls and allegiance they are Pakistani, and that is what matters to them.
things relatively simple. Keeping things simple lets the gown speak for itself.
Avoid the ‘wine wind down’
We are too well pleased with ourselves,
3:28: Boom! The answer is “Be a Man!”. And with that the continent of Atlantis has been swallowed by the sea under the crushing weight of the D-Bag wave.
And let me add that all persons in the US can of their own volition give money to the treasury or even dedicate additional money to our national debt. So if someone really believes they are not paying enough taxes then they could very easily write that check and the government will gladly accept it from you. So I find it very hypocritical that so-called wealthy/millionaires want the government to pass a law to be able to by force take additional money from them but not want to willingly just give it away to the government. Would it be that they know with their money they can afford the best tax accountants and attorneys in the world that will allow them to still pay less money then the amount the law states????
Erisman acquired a five and one half year old rye whiskey from Buffalo Trace (that is slightly younger than the standard Sazerac Rye aka Baby Saz)and aged the rye in botrytized dessert wine (i.e. Sauternes style) casks from Napa Valley's Dolce Winery for close to three months. The entire, fascinating story of the bottling, including how the whiskey evolved in the barrel, can be found on the Party Source website. The whiskey that resulted, as described in the notes below, has an interplay of sweet and spice that is unusual in rye. Erisman told me that this "sweet-spicy thing" along with the combination of sweetness in a typically dry whiskey, is what he was looking for when he dreamed up this experiment.
296Long lov'd, ador'd ideas, all adieu!
Here is a little more about my blog for those who are new here. :)
Ironclad takes many liberties with history but remains an entertaining film painting the heroic defenders with broad strokes and showcasing the vital nature of skilled and passionate warriors against the nameless hordes. In many ways, it makes a great showcase of how a unique group assembled for their talents may have that one last glorious battle against overwhelming odds.
We've been gathering and creating, hitting a couple great auctions and making some fun new stuff.
Except for watching NCIS. I am a devotee of Crime Drama and not just because I like Danny Pino and Shemar Moore (mmm, Shemar Moore.) I have never watched NCIS because everyone tells me that I would love it.
Do it yourself!
No strapless ball gowns here. Princesses like long sleeves, yes they do.
What upset me the most about this lady calling my child fat was the fact that she said it right in front of him and was rude. I know Maddux doesn't understand what that mean lady said but it's just the fact that it's like really, you couldn't wait until you got to the car to say that? I mean it was just uncalled for... it took everything I had to just stay calm and not strangle this lady.
“The country now has a clear choice,” added Darla St. Martin, Co-Executive Director of the National Right to Life Committee, “between an avowed pro-abortion ticket that would continue to push for unrestricted abortion on demand, and a strongly pro-life ticket that will bring us closer to a society that embraces the value and dignity of human life.”
You didn't know I was such a hopeless romantic, did you.
Design Seeds is now available for your iPhone/iPad. I will personally purchase a copy of the app as my gift to you! How great to carry color with you wherever you go! (Makes me want an iPad of my own! ;-)
During LIMRA’s annual conference, CEO Kerzner took that face-toface interaction even further when he showed the audience a scenario of a new producer curbside at a prospect’s house. Before the producer went in, he contacted a mentor through his iPad for a quick training refresher to build his confidence.
A program which makes a computer operate on other programs faster than prior art operating programs enabled it to do by virtue of the claimed features.
User behaviour is a more accurate model for assessing new features, rather than marketing a prototype which requires written or verbal feedback; what users do is often more than what they say. Real time testing and split testing allows for greater reliability in the data also.
13 Are We Ourselves?
Bring a lunch to work, as well as a preemptive strike for those morning meetings. Are you eating the donut because you're hungry or because you just want anything to eat during the hour long meeting and donuts are the only option? If it's because they're the only option, bring another option. Bring a granola bar and eat it slowly.
My reading of this tells me this was not written for our history books, but rather, was written by someone merely wanting to record the facts of what has happened. Frankly, some small bits of it do not ring true to me, but most of it does. The mention of clones may surprise you, but I have no idea about the truth of this specific point.
Somehow I sometimes forget that I'm like an angel when I'm changing a dirty diaper, so it's nice to be reminded! Now that we're just a few days away from Mother's Day, some of you may be looking for a quick and easy Mother's Day card that you can print and get in the mail today, and here it is! Thanks, Lori! It includes two cards on one sheet of paper, so you have multiple moms, grandmas, friends, etc. covered. Get the printable here.
CALLER: But I think, honestly, because there's more white people afraid of a black man taking over the nation.
What I have used here is the ready made kaya but you could also make your own. As requested by my son have also used red bean paste for few of the dough since that is his favorite filling.
HERBAL TEAS. Commercial products like horehound tea will provide relief. For brewing tea at home, 1 cup (250 ml) of boiling water is poured over 1-2 teaspoons (4.5-10 g) of an herb. The tea is steeped for about 10 minutes and then strained. Generally, up to 3 cups of tea may be drunk daily.
I have to admit – and yes, I know I am biased – when I think of a leader, I automatically think of an N. To me, a leader unites her team under a common vision, a common mission. Visions and missions by definition live in the future – the distant future. It takes an intuitive to keep tasks on-track with the team’s eyes on the ultimate objective.
Avery's 5 year-old reaction was...not good.
Last weekend I participated in the Writer's Digest Conference Pitch Slam. After the event, an agent-friend and I discussed the pitches that got us excited, and there was one in particular that became the subject of a debate. I talked about a pitch for a magical realism novel that I couldn't wait to read; she said the same about an urban fantasy. It took us all of ten seconds to realize we were talking about the same novel.
It all started back in 1955 with Kermit's first television appearance, and has lead to a global phenomenon that's still strong 50 years later! Since “The Muppet Show” began in 1976, audiences worldwide have embraced the Muppets. With the success of “The Muppet Show,” the Muppets branched out to the big screen, releasing their first feature film, “The Muppet Movie,” in 1979. The film starred a myriad of actors, including Bob Hope, Cloris Leachman, Steve Martin, Mel Brooks, Richard Pryor and Paul Williams. This impressive list of celebrity cast and cameos became the hallmark of all Muppet films, six of which followed, including “The Great Muppet Caper” (1981), “The Muppets Take Manhattan” (1984), “The Muppet Christmas Carol” (1992), “Muppet Treasure Island” (1996) and “Muppets from Space” (1999).
nak cantik, boleh. nak fashionable, boleh. nak buat pape pun, boleh.
Ewan led her over to the horses. Her heart sank as she saw one of them was saddled in the second version Howard had described.
Although a development corporation may be the obvious model for undertaking powers that does not mean that it directly should hold land. That is because there are great advantages in having additional stakeholders/directors. The resident involvement of the first proper Garden Cities was and is much higher than in the post war New Towns where the Treasury in effect owned the land and not local people. Similarly developers and landowners will naturally expect a reasonable cut. Although Garden Cities are about capturing unearned uplifts in land value for residents it makes sense to offer landowners a reduced but steady cut, not least to avoid years of dragged out land tribunal proceedings. Such a co-partnership type model was set out in the TCPA/Land Securities Reimaging Garden Cities for the 21st Century Report although it does not set out a specific legal/financial model. This post looks at what such a model might look like.
Today we were in the library. I noticed the book How to Do Your Own Divorce on the shelf. I picked it up and handed it to MathMan without a word. He promptly handed it back to me.
here is the designer tape i decided to use for this card
waking
Choose your own favorite from these different styles we have available this week at
p161 “…Christianity is the ‘religion’ of modern man and historical man, of the man who simultaneously discovered personal freedom and continuous time (in place cyclical time).”
The office is available for advice and individual appointments by telephone only. Please call (718) 645-3111. For those seeking such services, it may also be helpful to reach out directly to the New York City Department for the Aging. See here: http://www.nyc.gov/html/dfta/html/home/home.shtml.
I have included a few extra 'Beauties'!
America is awash in spirituality. And again, spiritual practices — personal prayer, meditation, yoga and the like — can indeed nourish the soul even if divorced from their religious roots. The world is awash in religions, and religions other than Christianity can offer meaning, moral guidance, and other good things for their adherents and communities. What I have to offer is my experience as a Christian, and I believe the Christian story makes the most sense of the world and is the best news for all of us.
Decade after Operation Defensive Shield, decrease in terror continues Freedom of the press, PA-style: Reporter arrested for “slander” Flytilla 2? Lebanese army threatens Israel at “Global March” tomorrow Abbas: Unity With Hamas Is Frozen Obama’s got Israel’s back… with a knife Video: New York JINO’s give comfort to the mullahs Is US acting to sabotage an Israeli strike on Iran? Алжир отказался хоронить тулузского стрелка Chief of Staff: More IDF women in more positions No Blogging Today — Off To The Expo Soccer Dad’s Middle East Media Sampler From The (State) Department Of WTF Can Anyone Identify This Flag? Muslims also seethe at non-Jews visiting Temple Mount IDF arranges medical treatment and transport of Palestinian patients Has @PeterBeinart ever been to Israel? The Middle East Media Sampler 03/29/2012: Missing Perspective Today’s blood libel, sponsored by the Syrian opposition Will Hamas’ Meshal Replace Abbas As President of Palestinian Authority? Can You Guess Who This Is? Decade after Operation Defensive Shield, the Jenin city prospers
This problem is mostly my fault. I know how flaky this person is; our relationship isn’t even a good one. This is one of those instances where I have to face my past and realize that this relationship is doing more harm than good. I suppose that’s why it’s difficult; another part of my past dies with this…connection, or whatever it is.
The back.
We’ve never recovered from the Great War. With the influenza epidemic hard on its heels, the War did damage to Western culture that has not yet run its course. Even those blessed souls who are totally ignorant of its history have to live with its consequences every day of their lives.
“Oh no,” Lindsay said.
-You haven't been in a single picture for the past 6 months, but you have 6 photo albums full of your kid
The remarkable astuteness of Thomas Aquinas, in dealing competently with one subject after another across decades, might even make one wonder what he “really believed.” I myself somehow gathered that Leo Strauss, in his last years, came to suspect that the remarkably intelligent and learned Thomas Aquinas he had come to know must have had more reservations about the religious orthodoxy of his day than he considered it responsible to make explicit. This would permit us to question, among other things, the story that has Thomas eventually repudiating his massive intellectual accomplishments as mere “straw,” an assessment that might even call into serious question any Faith that may have seemed to require such an apparent absurdity.
Lesson 2: Trust your gut feel.
Below are some of my favorites for the upcoming holidays:
but what I am, driven and in need.
Note to self: goat milk is good for tummies, goat milk soap is not.
There’s a french man with dreadlocks sitting pretty much infront of me now. He’s got a grey chequed/burberry hoody hanging on the back of his chair on top of his suit jacket/blazer. If his dreads were a lil tidier I would very on calling him cool.
Whilst we sat around for forty-five minutes, I watched these guys. They were all from pretty well-off families. Beneath the tough-guy bravado lay an upbringing revolving around a private school education, a childhood in a 4,000 square-foot house on a golf course, and a security gate to keep it safe from bad guys.
If these do not scream Cinco de Mayo I don’t know what does! Pinterest has yet again shown me an interesting recipe that I can easily make gluten free and dairy free and still delicious!
(Makes me think I should get my tetanus shot renewed. And that I could make a calendar with pictures of bizarre Long Island debris and sell it on Etsy.)
I have loads of traffic in my store (well March was a great month)and I feel that during these times, while shoppers may want to buy, money might be tight. So I'm offering a plan that will allow buyers to pay for their purchases in three easy payments through PayPal! My antique plates and photography are great gifts and we have Graduations and Mother's Day coming up. All the buyer needs to do is Convo me that they want to Lay-away and it's a done deal!
I give WINGS 2 stars.
I have managed to get T's presents - all are either second hand or greatly discounted in price. Feeling quite proud of myself with this achievement. I am off work from Thursday until the beginning of January when T goes back to school, I cant wait until I'm off, I really feel that I need the break. January is likely to be a busy month with beloved planning to work on his mum's bathroom which needs some repairs. I'm planning to sell more items on ebay and I also plan to sell some jewellry and other bits and bobs that I no longer want or need. What is the point of keeping them -taking up valuable space! For now I'm looking forward to Yule celebrations x
4/23/2012 Macy’s, Inc. 58501 Store Management Executive Development Program Career All, Bus/Econ
So, the first week, I lost ten pounds. I was excited by that. However, then the second week came, & I didn't do so well with weight loss. I stuck to the diet faithfully though. I have not cheated, not even a crumb. I have to ask Jamie or the girls to taste-test their foods to see if they are done or not. Nothing "foreign" or unapproved has entered my mouth or gone on my skin since I started this. And it hasn't been easy. Week two was by far THE HARDEST. I had three really bad days. One of them, I had no weight loss at all. And the other two--I had small weight gains. How is that possible when I'm only eating 500 calories?? All I know is it depressed me more than you can imagine.
i let it go and got excited, calling everyone I knew.
Make a variety of felt flowers in different sizes and colors. Each felt flower is made up of 8 circles. I made 4 different sizes of flowers for my wreath: 1 large flower using a 5" circle. 4 medium flowers using a 4" circle. 2 small flowers using a 2.5" circle. 3 mini flowers using a 1.75" circle.
To lift up to Him from my heart
Only one per cent of women surveyed said they chose to have sex at age 13 or younger, compared to five per cent at age 14 or 15, and 10 per cent at age 16 or 17.
He personally filibustered the 1964 Civil Rights Act on behalf of the Klan when he was nearing fifty years old.
The picture at top shows the house as it looked in 1922. At right, the home in 1936. (Pictures courtesy New York Public Library.)
they absorb into smiles
Harlow SD, Matanoski GM. The association between weight, physical activity, and stress, and variation in the length of the menstrual cycle. Am J Epidemiol 1991; 133: 38-49.
A few years ago I was sitting in the old Swansea bus station, minding my own business, reading a Sharpe book and checking my mobile, when this pigeon flew over. Now, the accuracy this pigeon had was insanely good, so good in fact, that it made me wonder if one of my enemies had actually trained it. With one well placed missile it managed to ruin my book and get the screen of my mobile, which promptly died.
Love, everyone.
Robust industrial production
Tamari rice cakes
Now, as for Averil's dilemma. Well, that's something all together perplexing. Pardon my hyperbole, but she's the best damn erotica-thriller writer I've read. Her prose, hot and tense in the it leaves good welts realm of superb, borders on the poetic. The hell with a bio. Her writing will speak for itself. Of course she has a fabulous imagination, but I suspect, like any writer, you can see shades of who Averil is by reading her.
This isn't exactly the same thing, but it feels right to do this for him.
My dad was around 29 years old at the time; tall, a full head of beautiful light brown curly hair, clear blue eyes, straight teeth that had escaped the eager, greedy hands of his family's orthodontist when he was a teen. My dad grew up in all-American, upper middle class family of nine children in Arizona during the 60's. He escaped Vietnam by just a couple of years, unlike his brother who my father, at age sixteen, saw buried. His father was a federal judge, his mother had a master's degree in Psychology but was a housewife and a devout Mormon. He came from a family with a history of power and success; his maternal grandmother had served in the Arizona State legislature in the 1940s (no small feat for a woman at the time), his paternal grandfather was a Professor of tax law. All of his siblings had gone on to law school, or had become accountants or had started to work their way up the military ranks.
Hyperphosphatemia Overview 7
I forgive myself that I haven’t accepted and allowed myself to realize that indeed I am nothing until I allow myself to participate and “play” around with pictures in my head completely making myself blind and distracted from being able to see what is happening and thus become a participant in this reality
2) This actually goes back to rule 1 (everything goes back to rule 1); but, DO NOT PROPOSE IN FRONT OF/NEAR YOUR FAMILY!!
We see that in its slow-motion way, a tortoise actually rescues one of its kind… evaluates the situation, gets into position and pulls off a turnover.
(Sooyoung’s POV End)
Autumn is a time of colour and change. And yes, it has definitely arrived.
"His whaaat?"
Fay, this is a great start for a story. You’ve built a nice amount of intrigue by setting up this mystery. However the voting works out, here’s what I think, you should use this story and work with it. Maybe put out 500 or so words every couple of days for your followers. It’s really good.
I had passed the test. What wasn’t told was that through the technique of Silva Mind Control I had opened myself to real spirit guides. (For a more in-depth view of this, you can go to Sharon Beekman’s book, Enticed by the Light). She vividly portrays what happens when a person opens himself up to these entities. Please remember also that we are told in the Guidebook to the Supernatural to avoid any contact with these malevolent impostors!
Social: Is community the focus of your social media campigns? Or are you just obsessed with getting the likes and show a bunchful of members (Read Zombieland of Facebook Likes) adorn your business page. If latter is the case then you are not ready for social media campaign. You are not old fashioned but you haven’t changed with time. Well, here is the time to start. Where to start? Try by visitng your competitors social media outposts – now check out others from your industry but in different geographies. Probably trendsetters are already leading the way. If you are a small business owner then read, learn and start experimenting. But you got to start NOW. Make an status update, let the love flow and let your community and customers know that you not only exist, you care too. Be social!
“Watch for the CDS losers to set up some “rogue traders” to take the hit for massive losses.”
And here to prove why she is tall is this picture below. Where in the world did she get those legs?
There was no explanation of what “50 percent of the projected economic activity” measures.
“Hi, looks like you came in just in time to get one drink. Pity.” She cocked an eyebrow and drew up her ruby red lips into a pucker. Their gaze wasn’t broken.
Hip Flip
I am the LORD thy God which teacheth thee to profit, which leadeth thee by the way that thou shouldest go. Is. 48:17
But not this Christmas.
The row sizes given will yield a 48″ x 60″ baby quilt. Of course, as with most modern, some-what improvised designs, you can easily make this quilt larger, simply by making the rows longer or making some rows twice (or more than twice!)
This past May 1st, the Occupy Movement called for a general strike in the US. The rights for workers still on the forefront, they took to the streets to bring their message of the 99% to the 1%… again. From New York to San Francisco to Spain, Turkey, and the Philippines, marches and rallies went on during the day pushing the fight for fair wages, jobs and equality. While it’s hard to argue with those goals, some protestors did have run ins with the police. Tear gas was fired in Oakland (again!), there were shoving matches in Philadelphia and tense standoffs in New York and San Francisco. Despite that, the majority of events were peaceful efforts of civil disobedience.
Undaunted by the changes in local events, our friend Bob, ( he of the chicken dance and Alzheimer’s ), just kept moving through time eternal as though nothing else ever happens, which it doesn‘t in his world, as he ambles through his daily routines.
Any of my fairies
The commission sometimes effectively repudiated earlier judicial rulings without explaining why they were incorrect, or its own findings right. Sometimes, it got even basic facts wrong-such as the death toll in a well-known incident. On occasion, it misrepresented what courts or commissions of inquiry had earlier said. At other times, it simply ignored judicial rulings altogether, putting forth its own version of the truth as if no contrary finding existed. Both the law and principles of transparency and fairness require judges to give reasons for their findings. Often the TRC did not bother.
Now we are FINALLY getting into a nice normal routine. I'm getting out of the house, seeing friends, doing things on my own without needing so much help,etc. Hopefully all of the drama is over (*crossing my fingers*!!)
Masks are powerful symbols
My hand tightened on my shoulder and I winced. I took a deep breath and blinked my tears away. I gazed back at the sea, watching the waves ripple. Maybe the world doesn’t care?
You will be hearing more about this, perhaps, if you frequent enough of the right kinds of conservative blogs, such as Anti-Idiotarian Rottweiler, although his purpose, based on a suggestion from a commenter at Legal Insurrection, is somewhat different in scope from my own. The suggestion here is for conservatives to vote Green in the Presidential race, as opposed to some conservative third party, in order to help the Greens qualify for federal matching funds for future elections, and thus turn into a permanent thorn in the side of the Democrats.
Day one.
Only you folks my age understand these profound statements!
Pleased to report only two streetlights out in Wyberton, one on Bankside and one about to go(showing very dim) on Causeway East along with five illuminated road signs, all reported to LCC via their website.
‘No previous psychiatric history, but struggling a bit at college lately. Smoking a lot of weed, trying to fit in. Increasingly bizarre behaviour. Then apparently she took some LSD a week ago and hasn’t ever really come down off the trip. So she’s being admitted with an acute psychotic episode and a query on schizophrenia. We’re hoping against hope it’s not that, obviously. Mum has come over to travel back with her to the secure psychiatric hospital in her home town. The doctor and ASW are due any minute for another dose of Lorazepam and the section papers. She’s been agitated and volatile, but I don’t think she poses too much of a risk. Are you happy to go with just the mum as an escort? It’d be great if she could go tonight. We’re not erm... we’re not really set up for this.’
Maurico Mendoza, my lawyer, is picking up today (no telling why they couldn't give it to me then and there) and I will go to his house tomorrow afternoon and pay him for his service.
And, oddly enough, I think my family is related to the Price boys. (looking at the time stamp of this post, I started this back on Oct 10th of 2010. Longest I ever took for a review.)
encourage and inspire
Belfer Center for Science and International Affairs, Harvard Kennedy School
By Mike Houlahan – Editor
Ah! I can't say yet. All the winners will be notified by post at the end of August. So you will have to be patient a bit longer. Meanwhile, look at these photos and see if you can spot your picture.
Not that I would have had time.
* sewing kit
So when you consider that huge impact that teachers have on their students, and by extension the world, then maybe we should just simply be thankful to have the privilege of being teachers.
The Piggy Back
THIS Week. A slight improvement for me. 3/7 although I was not helped by knowing little about women’s hair and nothing about Wild Things. What will you score in this week’s quiz?
The seedlings and all
I love all things supernatural and throughout its history Roma people have had an intense relationship with the supernatural. While fortune telling is considered to be a source of livelihood, it’s not something that they practice amongst themselves. They do however strongly embrace a principle of healing (called advising). It incorporates many supernatural themes including omens, curses, charms, amulets, talismans, potions and healing rituals. Their belief is that they prevent misfortune or heal sickness. Roma women are the caretakers of all medical knowledge – traditional and scientific. A female healer who prescribes these cures or preventatives is called a drabarni or drabengi. Roma people are open to healing, miracles, prophecy and deliverance. It’s most likely to be a big part of this trip. All I can say is bring it!
“But don’t you think they might feel a bit awkward knowing they are both competing for the same job?” Rob asks tactfully.
Since this article was posted, there have been another 2 protests in Palestine in solidarity with the Syrian uprising – one in Ramallah and one in Jerusalem. There is also one scheduled by the Palestinian community in Haifa for Wednesday.
anyway, mr. cta said to the MITM and i quote (i mean, really darlings, did you think i was really reading?) "there is a conference of jehovah's witness in columbia, south carolina and the ward is going to pay our way to go to it on thursday of next week." well, my darlings, the MITM hit the proverbial fucking ceiling! his words and i quote exactly, "if they are willing to pay your way to FUCKING south carolina for a religious conference, then they damn sure should be willing to help you find a damn apartment! your people know your situation. you need a job and a place for your family to live!" oh yeah, he went there! it seems our dear visitors and their coreligionists are willing to abide with the non-believers (us) sheltering them and see no problem with us expending our money and hospitality to mr&mrs cta and family instead of the church members doing it. mr cta did not want to understand that asking us to continue to house them and simply wait for their return, rather than finding a place for him and his family BEFORE he went on some religious revival was an insult to us and certainly, an abuse of our hospitality. we have not asked them for a penny, nor were we doing this out of any other instinct than friendship. now, remember, mr cta KNOWS the MITM. he worked for the MITM for years in deepestdarkestafrica, so he is well aware of what it means when the MITM raises his voice. MITM flat out told him that going to "some bullshit gospel revival" rather than taking care of the business he came here for was flat out ridiculous and that the MITM was not going to subsidize any of this kinda crap. mr cta tried to counter with something about the bible and the MITM told him "you might as well be telling me something from a comic book or alice in wonderland. i don't give a fuck about your drug of choice." (just so you know, the MITM respects all religions, but not on his dime. his philosophy is, "to you be your way, to me be mine" when it comes to matters of faith. he personally thinks all religions are 95% mythology and 5% of any good to humanity, and then only in the hands of tolerant and reasonable people.)
Jesus speaks of the tremendous trust he has in God his Father and the tremendous trust we ought to have in him because he is our good shepherd (John 10:11). Sheep without a shepherd are defenseless against prey, such as wolves, and often get lost and bewildered without a guide. That is why shepherds literally live with their sheep out in the open field and mountain sides. The shepherd guards his sheep from the dangers of storms, floods, and beasts of prey. The shepherd leads his sheep to the best places for feeding and the best streams for drinking. He finds the best place for their rest and safety at night. The sheep recognize the voice of their shepherd and heed his call when he leads them to safe pasture and rest. We are like sheep – we become easy prey to forces which can destroy us – sin, Satan, and a world opposed to God and his people. Jesus not only frees us from Satan’s snares and the grip of sin, he leads us to the best of places where we can feed on the “word of life” and drink from the “living waters” of his Holy Spirit. The sheep who heed the voice of Jesus, the good shepherd, have no fear. He will lead them to the best of places – everlasting peace, joy, and fellowship with God and his people.
One of Jesuit magazine America’s most popular writers has spoken out in defence of the Leadership Conference of Women Religious (LCWR), the organisation whose members represent more than 80% of women religious in the U.S. and which recently received a big thumbs down from the Holy See after a strict doctrinal evaluation showed it had ignored on questioned the teachings of the Catholic Church on the subjects of abortion, homosexuality and divorce. “Catholic sisters are my heroes. In the wake of the Vatican document, my sister friends, some nearing the end of their lives, seemed to need a word of gratitude. The very least I could do was to show some support in a small way.” Fr. James Martin had already published an article in the prestigious New York Jesuit magazine America, expressing his support for Sister Elizabeth Johnson after the nine members of the U.S. Church’s doctrinal commission (led by the Archbishop of Washington Cardinal Donald W. Wuerl) branded the work of the theologian from Fordham university as "seriously inadequate as a presentation of the Catholic understanding of God."
07. Gaby - Brincar Y Bailar
I’m having all these, lusty lunges – yup, I made that up. I’m defining it as ‘embarrassing double entendres you throw out when you start losing all sense of friendship propriety’. The moment when your eyes glaze over and wipe out all proper buddy behavior and replace it with “I wonder what you look like naked?”
Alcohol was banned at Brazilian football matches in 2003 as part of attempts to tackle violence between rival football fans.
~Anna
"Yes. We even thought the equipment might be malfunctioning. But biomedical checked it out. It's working perfectly. Her brain appears to be in some kind of fugue state. Hyper-excitement."
We have friends coming to town this weekend to stay with us, though, so that's definitely something to look forward to. I'm trying to focus on that, dammit!
TTFN!
2 flatbed carts up behind us.
(Mark 15:3-5)
Richard and I are of course disappointed at the poor viewing figures released earlier this week. Our new show struggled to reach the five figure mark. Put into perspective more people watched Leicester City draw 0-0 with Oldham Athletic at the weekend than watched us interviewing Toyah Wilcox about her anal lift.
A few weeks ago, Manila Cathedral closed its doors to the public because of structural concerns. They’re in the process of fixing the structural defects I heard. This church is around 50 years old and is the 8th reconstruction.
Wash lettuce leaves and leave intact, drying on paper towels. Cut chicken into 1 inch cubes, place in bowl. Add egg white and cornstarch, stir. Let marinate 20 or 30 minutes in the fridge while you prepare vegetables. Slice green beans, mushrooms, zucchini, peppers, and scallions for stir fry. Do not mix. Remove peel from tangerine and slice into bite size pieces, removing seeds.
We need to work together for peace, and balance with the other side. We need to take care of the Earth that feeds and shelters us. We need to put our entire mind and heart into pursuing unity and fusion now, to confront the other side and preserve life. “To be Ready for this Moment in History Mr. Barrios told his audiences in Santa Fe that we are at a critical moment of world history. “We are disturbed,” he said. “We can’t play anymore. Our planet can be renewed or ravaged. Now is the time to awaken and take action.
The summer after his absentee father is killed in a random shooting, Paul volunteers at a Harlem soup kitchen where he listens to lessons about "the social contract" from an elderly African American man.
I'm just a girl. A wife. A mom.
The whole world around me is wrapped in a shroud
“They criticize us for preying on weaker species, but neglect to offer a constructive solution as to what we’re supposed to eat for dinner,” said a full-grown male speaking at news conference at a suburban Pocatello Holiday Inn. “I can’t walk into a store and buy a hot dog. I don’t have any money and, even if I did, I don’t have any pockets to carry it in.”
Recently I moved the leaves aside to give the plants a drink and I noticed a distinctive smell. A sniff of the fingers confirmed it - definitely a tomato plant.
-Income Tax Self Assessment full enquiries
The following timeline and associated text provided further below is intended to provide the reader with a general and simplified overview of the development of the Christian Church. For a more detailed description of the history of the church, the reader is encouraged to read The Byzantine Legacy in the Orthodox Church by Fr. John Meyendorff and Rome-Constantinople-Moscow Historical and Theological Studies also by Fr. John Meyendorff. The first chapter in the latter reference begins with the following paragraph:
It is well known that in 2009, of the top 100 largest economic entities of the world, 44 were corporations. The wealth of these families, which are among the top 10% shareholders in each of these, is far in excess of national economies. In fact, total global GDP is around 70 trillion dollars. The Rothschild family wealth alone is estimated to be in the trillions of dollars. So is the case with the Rockefellers who were helped and provided money all along by the Rothschilds. The US has an annual GDP in the range of 14-15 trillion dollars. This pales into insignificance before the wealth of these trillionaires. With the US government and most European countries in debt to the Elite, there should be absolutely no doubt as to who owns the world and who controls it. To quote Eustace Mullins from his book The World Order:
My person is intoxicated with content.
This makes more sense to me and is closely related to how people make decisions – quickly and irrationally. It is only after experiencing the product that I will be quick to form a judgment on the brand. And my repeat purchase will depend heavily on my post-rationalisation of my first-time purchase.
Now I'm fifty.
I can't say that the weekend was totally unproductive. Ross and I did drive out to Sugar Land on Sunday and look at neighborhoods. We definitely crossed some neighborhoods off our list and I guess we found some we like. We just disagree a little bit on what is a reasonable commute time. I am willing to live farther away and make the drive, but Ross would like to live a little closer to the freeway. I completely understand his concern since he will be the one making the commute while I will (most likely) end up staying home, but some of the nicer neighborhoods are farther away. It's such a trade off and it's hard to find a happy medium.
it's a noodle N, just. EAT. it. for the love of all that is good in this great country of ours. just eat the (damn) noodle.
....I can't imagine why they make scissors with a plastic hinge screw but they are going back to where I bought them from.
Played a Lego game and then deep cleaned the bathroom with the kids.
In the last few decades atheists have been a rapidly declining percentage of world population. They are now 2.5% of world population. Agnostics and those who are indifferent to religion are also a somewhat more slowly declining percentage of the world's population, they are now 11.5%.
Sunday was the third Brew Day in the past week. And for the third time in as many brew sessions, the beer of choice was a session beer. After experimenting with The Ultimate Table Beer last week, I opted for a more traditional style this time. Enter Hwart's Bitter (MB0029).
1/2 cup shredded Monterey Jack cheese
Come to Lake Toba, you will enjoy with us
Onto the best bit:
Go ahead, enrich the phone companies. Pay more to say less. You don’t have a texting problem.
The minutes and hours that add up to your life?
I know now that I’ll be on my 7 soon and I’ll take my whole environment with me.
(Also, I’m aware that the above was a really bad plan.)
‘In fact, we expect stronger storms in the upcoming solar cycle.’
All three beers were a big hit and it was a joy, in the fullest sense of that word, to share my creations with a crowd of appreciative people. This is one of the things I love most about this hobby--it's not just about making beer that I can drink myself. It's about sharing something that I have crafted with pride and bringing some good cheer to others.
A lot of readers might dismiss it as lacking in action or too touchy-feely for their liking, but The Enchanted April is a book that never fails to work its magic on me. Starting in a dark, damp London February and moving to the heat and light of an Italian April, this is the perfect novel for Spring reading. The reader, too, can leave behind doom, gloom and persistent rain and bask in glorious sunshine.
Let’s say you face all the music and convince your parents to get you married to the person you love and think it’s going to be a “happily ever after” sort of a life, only to realize that things are not really all that fine. And you (mutually) think of a divorce. Bhamm!
- 1 fried egg as garnish (optional)
I can tell this is a “bittersweet” episode. (if I may quote the judges)
Silence or white noise?
Amazing how, now that I feel I have revelation of the things that are important, I wish I had known these things all along! Simple things like “It’s doesn’t matter what other people think of you so long as you’re true to yourself” or “Time is a healer” or “learn to love yourself!”
Okay, that’s it for BEFORE and AFTER shots, now just some more after shots.
Director: Gene Kelly
So here is my fish tale although it is a real tale.
It represents everything that I hate about modern education, that it no longer is that, e-ducere, to lead out, but e-shove-in-o.
For this challenge, I have set out a rule for participants to maker either a layout and/or two cards. For this post, I am highlighting the cards I have made as examples based on a sketch made by the talented DebbyD who is the administrator of Let's Scrap. Thank you Debby for an awesome sketch. I had so much fun working out my sample cards that I know I can make more.
Patent royalties can remain in effect only for the life of the patent, but know-how royalties may continue well after the licensed patents expire (see discussion on know-how licences below).
Me (proudly): I shaved my legs!
9It is not the old who are wise, and those who are full of years have not the knowledge of what is right.
It’s hardly a startling revelation that nationalism often coincides with euroscepticism. More eye-catching is the break-down in the number of people who identify first as British / English. This survey suggests that over 60% of people in England view themselves primarily as English rather than British. That compares to just over 40%, as recently as 2008.
And dear sweet ancient baby alien space monkey jebus forbid, you are not heterosexual. Then you are just screwed. Who is the bread-winner? What if you can’t get married? What if you can’t adopt because you are gay? What if you don’t want any effing kids anyway? What if you don’t want to be traditional? Then what?
In this still virgin year, I am planning to read a few books(which I haven’t done in a long time). And where would I find a better place to blog about them.
The above is said by Laureline, one of the heroes in this book, when she’s shrunk by the villain because… well… because that’s what villains always do to female leads, isn’t it?
Wandrei was born in Saint Paul, Ramsey County, Minnesota. All of his grandparents were early Minnesota settlers. Donald’s father, Albert Christian Wandrei, became chief editor of West Publishing Company, America’s leading publisher of law books. Donald grew up in his parents’ house at 1152 Portland Ave, St Paul and lived there most of his life save for a stint in the Army and occasional sojourns in New York and Hollywood. He loved frequent rambles in the woods along the Minnesota River; it was Wandrei who later taught August Derleth the fine art of morel hunting.
The critics say: “Unsettling and charming is a hard combination to pull off, but Cults have managed just fine.” – The Guardian
The idea came forth the following day. I need to trust myself and the world. I do not trust either. I know, intellectually, that I can trust myself and the world, and now I choose to take that into my heart. I knew, then, how to do this: I will enumerate my good qualities, and the evidence that I have them, and I will think on them. Always I have felt terrified because I am not Perfect, and though my idea of perfect has changed over the years it has always been different from who I am. Now, it seems, I may be good enough.
Epoxy-based coatings may contain trace amounts of BPA. Scientific evidence evaluated by regulatory agencies in the United States, Canada, Europe, Japan, Australia and New Zealand has consistently shown these coatings to be safe, and regulatory agencies have stated that human exposure to BPA from epoxy-based can coatings is well below safe exposure limits set by government bodies worldwide.
British soldiers on the ground in Northern Ireland, after the honeymoon period between them and the Catholic population ended in the spring and summer of 1970, developed a fierce hostility towards the nationalist population of NI that was returned in spades. If this was true during the Troubles, how much truer will it be during our Muslim Troubles? All of the hard fighting that the British Army has taken part in in the last twenty years has taken place against Muslims. There is an entire generation of young soldiers coming through who have never fought anyone else, and who will be painfully well aware of the fact that the Muslim ‘Britons’ they face on the streets would have been at best ambivalent about, and at worst psychologically on the other side during, those conflicts. The hostility shown returning British soldiers on the streets of the UK will not be quickly forgotten.
This is a huge, complex and multiple topic - which probably deserves an entire blog, not just one short blog post - and I accept that I'm brushing the surface and that, as always, there are many ways of looking at any one thing.
And that was the end of that burst of creativity. It was a great new challenge, and it was sure nice while it lasted
Then, there are my perennials that spread by rhizome. These types of perennials can be a bit more invasive and tricky to control. They send out a “stem” in shallow soil, that sprouts up in a different location. They work really well, if you have an area that you are looking to fill, but if you’re not careful, they can “smother” your other plants and rob the nutrients they need. My loosestrife, for example, decided that it was going to come up in the middle of a cattail (another plant that spreads by rhizome). The remnant of the cattail is now among the plants on my window-sill.
Flared pint glass I use for stouts.
Black Tweedy Pants - M&Co
Plate mail ($500+) - no one in their right mind wears a full suit of plate mail in Wampus Country; not only is it impractical, but also a blatant reminder of the 'old country'. A man in plate is picking a fight just by walking around.
In a review of Sätty’s art, S.F. Chronicle art critic Thomas Albright stated, “His work evidenced his Germanic roots with a somber, dreamlike realm of utopian, surrealist fantasy spiced by disarming accents of the bizarre and grotesque.” His art has been exhibited in many galleries and museums, including the San Francisco Museum of Modern Art; the Museum of Modern Art, New York; the Boston Museum of Fine Arts; the National Museum of Art, Belgrade; and the National Museum, Warsaw."
Lately we have been making good ol' Aglio e Olio (go here for that recipe) or gorgeous Summery pesto variations - some that the kids have invented (the picture below is of a gorgeous recipe we made from the fab Whole Larder Love's great online cooking series) & who can beat just fresh tomatoes with a little EVOO & fresh basil in Summer. YUM. Fresh ingredients at their best.
Saviour Jesus Christ.
1/2 cup gouda cheese, shredded
Fox 5 talked to the UPS driver.
“There has been an attorney-client breakdown in which the defendant feels that attorney Jose Baez’ defense strategy is innefective, not sound or reasonable,” Jackson, who is being held in Michigan, wrote.
Glen Hirshberg – Miss Ill-Kept Runt
Breaking with my usual literate top-down presentation I'll concentrate on the code required to solve the puzzles and leave the obvious scaffolding to the reader. I'll still putt over the par, especially if scored against Remco's brutally terse solutions, but I hope that what is missing is straightforward to fill in. I've written about point-free style and its limitations in the face of OCaml's value restriction. In this case I'll use monadic style for the solutions as a way to show that procedural expression too has its place in functional programming.
The crunchiness of the cookies was just right! Also they were not too sweet.
VAPORISE BARNEY My initial thought concerns that microphone and your arse!
His injury has gotten much better.
Put the dough in a large bowl or plastic container and cover it with plastic wrap, pressing the wrap directly onto the surface of the dough. Let the dough proof (that is, grow and develop flavor) in the refrigerator for at least 6 hours or up to overnight.
Tonight: Same deal. Another coat of polyurethane on closet-shelves, back-of-closet, and bookshelf-shelves. But the back-of-closet and closet-shelves will be 100% done after that (not counting optional 400-grit final sanding).
5And these are the words which you will say before the Lord your God: My father was a wandering Aramaean, and he went down with a small number of people into Egypt; there he became a great and strong nation:
Wouldn't it be cheaper to leave them on the tree in the first place?
I’ve heard the Lake District’s nice in July……
@osgood9: " Yes Glenn your own gold dust covered straight jacket"
I wanted the glass to be clear. The first round the sugar did not cooperate. It was yellow. (And yes, I'm blaming the sugar here).
Email: Matt@PixieVacations.com
- NO queso/cheese dip for an appetizer
Anyway, I asked “who are you” and the first few words you said in answer were “God, I don’t know” or something like that, right?
Crews are planning to close Washington Avenue between existing US 10 and Mill Creek Drive in the town of Cameron, Wood County, beginning Monday, April 30. The road is scheduled to reopen by Friday, May 11.
Trying to force himself to focus, Rel walked straight up to Pollack, who said, “No change?” The Sherriff was a broad man, running to fat in places, and round cheeks and a double chin took most of the anger out of his glare.
Dinner: Panera Bread French Onion Soup (no bread)
I didn't meet any lottery winners, but I did meet some very helpful people from Camelot, the lottery company, whose job it is to help and advise winners. I read an article in a magazine about a seminar for young rich people - perhaps not quite as young as Lia - so, yes, they do exist. I also talked to someone who had worked as a private banker for a long time and had advised young lottery winners. It's not 100 per cent accurate - Lia would have met with a panel of independent financial advisers - but it's mostly based on the real experience of lottery winners.
You can follow the crowd and do what all other guys do, but you are doomed to the same fate if you do that. You are doomed to the fifty plus percent divorce rate. And the risk of an affair as well. Or, you can do your own thing and learn how to attract a woman so that she looks at you as being a one in a million kind of guy. The kind of guy that she would not leave and the kind of guy that she would not cheat on.
2010.09.09 Iraq Abu Ghraib 1 0 A policeman is killed in his own home by terrorists.
In 2011, the group reunited.
Justin and I tend to give Benjamin baths together. It is one of the few, precious moments where we can be together and enjoy each other’s company without someone running away (ahemBenjamincough). One of our favorite things to do with Benjamin is teach him words. Words, my friend, are power. Words help people communicate and ask for their way!
Have you ever thought about all the great places that exist to ride a motorcycle around the world. The places I really let my thoughts run wild!
i woke up robert and he was, of course, SUPER SUPPORTIVE. the babies and me come first he adamantly told me! he whipped up a plan in no time for us to be able to make all of our ends meet financially, calmed all of my fears and worries, had me make a grocery list so we girls could have the proper nutrients for the weekend, told me to put the shop on hold ASAP and then tucked me in for nice 3 and a half hour nap.
SU: Sentiment and Brad
The home they perfected with post-wedding dreams and flowers.
than five hundred brothers and sisters at once,
I had asked them to bring the verses they found in their Scripture search to this retreat, and to think about this question, “What is the purpose of Messiah Lutheran Church’s ministry? Why are we here?” And so the process began. First we needed to tackle the question as to the purpose of our ministry. We began to lift up the things that mattered at Messiah, things like learning from the sermons and in classrooms, experiencing fellowship with one another, serving (even though we knew this was not a strength, but it was something we felt deeply about). We began to see there were three areas of focus: education, fellowship, and service. Now we needed to put that into a memorable and portable purpose statement.
Mary went, Mary went,
The case can be thrown out if the judge finds insufficient evidence.
I drank a glass, still seething over the fact that I hadn’t found a stylist. But, I didn’t cut my hair. By morning. I was glad that I hadn’t. I’d made it through another day.
Again, I went thin and printed on basic printer paper, except I printed a bit of the quilted coral on cardstock to punch my Martha Stewart butterflies. I kept seeing these teeny tiny beauties on other cards, so I finally located a punch and bought it. I keep resisting the urge to punch butterflies out of everything I see. LOL I took some light orange and yellow pearls which I touched up with R35 Copics to more closely match my papers.
Shock Corridor fictionalises division, particulary that surrounded around the divided self and the divided society. It is about divided passions – director Sam Fuller stated in an interview about the film that “in our society, for some reason or another, we love to hate”. Narrative is not the only way Fuller seeks to disassemble: the form and texture of the film itself aggressively demands exploration, most notoriously with its jumps between black and white and colour footage. Ostensibly a Film Noir – at least insomuch as the murder mystery framework, the use of light and shadow, the existential anguish of the protagonist suggest it to be – Shock Corridor also presents a generic divide in its references to the Hollywood musical. While topically and dramatically distinct from the traditionally lightweight story matter of the musical, Shock Corridor still utilises song and dance routines—“numbers”– to create both meaning in their own terms, but also to provide a dual-focus narrative layer within the text as a whole. Shock Corridor is not a musical as such, but this combination of musical numbers with a thematic fascination with contradictory worlds draws significant parallels. But where the musical tends to find joyous equilibrium, Fuller’s film instead seems consciously and confrontationally askew. The famous ‘nympho’ rape sequence, for example, contradicts traditional musical genre codes by the very nature of its dark subject matter and its low-budget Noir surface, but also contains enough formal and structural similarities with the musical to make it a legitimate point of comparison. Unusual representations of insanity and violence within the film such as this can be approached via Mikhail Bakhtin’s notion of the carnivalesque and its relationship to spectacle, performance and performer and may provide a significant methodology for aligning the formal aspects of the film with a broader reading whereby a divided (dual-focused, critical/spectatorial) mind is required to understand the divided (insane) world of Shock Corridor.
Oct 9 - Feinkost Lampe, Hannover, Germany
Friday, November 11th – Show and Tell
I've been watching movies on TV today and
I’m surfing in my lair
I started with the following materials:
There was also a parachute drop. Instead of candy, however, there were prizes like CA glue, etc. Yes, those were grown men running around the field in the hopes of catching one of the parachutes that were dropped out of an RC plane. Just like at the airshow that Jay’s club puts on.
I didn't risk getting too close to the water to take better pictures - obviously the salting machines aren't bothering with this part of town (a strategy I agree with), and I thought sliding down the ice and into the lake would not be a very dignified way to go. Unlikely, yes, but I have an overactive imagination.
Who knew trying to meet up for dinner would take several months?
Knead until elastic
That paint seems a little bit too dark. No worries, maybe the wagons are just dirty. They have now received final painting and had their decals applied. All they need is a spot of varnish and my train sub-project is off to a start. The green flag has been waved so to speak...
Into the village of Hoe. The feeling is that only the affluent live here – large detached houses with adjacent paddocks; or country cottages, some period, some modern pastiches, a large number of which have the requisite Wisteria around the door such that it becomes something of a cliché; or more modern properties down gravel tree-lined lanes ostentatiously marked ‘Private’. It seems highly unlikely that anyone employed in that profession now could afford to live in ‘Keeper’s Cottage’. As at Kingswood, the high hedges and fences either side of the narrow footpath suggest that the public are allowed to pass only begrudgingly.
A lot of people will look for realism in a mannequin. This will be dependent on your needs. Most suppliers will advise you on which mannequins are best suited for which garment types.
John Christie - Here's To Love
DAMIEN: So tell me all about it.
She turned the corner to Black Street where the abortion clinic was located. She could see several blocks down, across the street from the clinic the handful of protesters with their signs hanging from their necks, with their Tim Horton’s coffee in one hand and a rosary in the other. Ah crap, not them again, Tori said to herself.
Look for a moment at I John 3:1-2, "Behold, what manner of love the Father hath bestowed upon us, that we should be called the sons of God: therefore the world knoweth us not, because it knew him not. Beloved, now are we the sons of God, and it doth not yet appear what we shall be: but we know that, when he shall appear, we shall be like him; for we shall see him as he is."
3. God will give you all that you need. “So you shall serve the Lord your God, and He will bless your bread and your water” (v. 25). –Divine provision!
at a point in time being a "good parent" also means being a co-operative person and understanding off-spring mean the best for your personal health and their efforts are Not to be Slighted
So raise a Saint Arnold this evening and toast to the 75th anniversary of beer being legalized again!
We will again be reminded of why we do something so crazy as growing our own food. The more I see on the news about our food, the more I am glad that I am able to grow even a small portion of what we eat. I can be a part of the history of our world, by growing and eating foods that have been nurtured for thousands of years.
They were also selling the premium Suntory blended whisky Hibiki in 17, 21 and 30-year-old versions and a combo pack of a 180ml Yamazaki 12 and a small bottle of Hibiki 17 for 2,800 yen.
Just like my faith, really. Jesus is human, so he’s not a professional who merely studies our struggles. He’s not just an expert on real life – he’s gone through it. I’d be on that show any day.
I really do believe it’s better to give than to receive so with that in mind, I have an amazing giveaway for you today!
“NCSE and its cronies completely demonize the intelligent design community, even those who agree with evolution happened. Religion is not a target since even National Academy of Science embraces religion. So it seems the real target is those who fail to kneel before Darwinain theory of natural selection and prevent the further fattening of the Darwinain industry tapeworm.”
m/ Other cases in accordance with the Prime Minister’s regulations.”
Declaring that he is now reading about Reagan is like putting the cherry on top the trickle down mess he just pushed on us.
With the medalists from Daegu not playing a major factor the rest of the season ranking was a tad difficult, but not impossible – and note that none of the top women has a winning record for the season as the women raced fairly often and did a good job of playing “Ro Sham Bo” with each other.
The FA have made another HUGE mistake in picking another yes man in Hodgson,Roy will make England organised and they may win a few games,but end result will be the same when it comes to the country feeling cheated,the only difference this time,is that the FA have had months to make a decision and have still chosen the wrong man,I hope the English fans vote with their feet and fail to attend the Friendlies and championship games,why should the man on the street waste his hard earned money on a team managed by an organisation who have no respect or time for his opinion.
La Fleche d’Or
I am very grateful for this opportunity to work with everyone.
I've been sick for a month. I can't adequately care for my family. I can barely do anything. But cough. And sweat. And pray.
German unions represent workers across industries, and contracts are negotiated industrywide so that one company can’t play off its employees against those working for a competitor. Despite this advantage, unions allowed wages to decline in exchange for job security as German industry became stronger. Unemployment has been dropping — at least Germans received the promised job security — but their purchasing power is slowly declining, reinforcing the trend toward Germany becoming overly dependent on exports. More than half of Germany’s exports go to European Union countries.
Nevertheless, and just as mentioned in the Appeals Court’s Decision, one must pay attention to an eventual conflict of rights.
Jesse Lasky (born this day in 1880) is best known these days for being one of the founders of Paramount Pictures (you see his name in the titles of those early silents “Famous Players-Lasky”). But he climbed to his exalted position allt he way up the show business ladder, never skipping a rung. Beginning from his native San Francisco, he started out in medicine shows, then became a coronet player, forming a vaudeville act with his sister Blanche. From here he became an agent and promoter.
Wednesday already? How time flies. Well I have been busy with the curves class, and really having fun with the impromptu curves. I feel like I am a week behind.
I have also enjoyed the wonderful posts for the giveaway and the ideas of how we can all help out this season.
Oakbrook Terrace - A concert and an outdoor movie will be shown. Police and fire fighters will be on hand, along with their vehicles. This takes place at Heritage Center, 1 S 325 Ardmore, from 6:00 pm to 10:30 pm.
With an average of 450 mg of antioxidants and polyphenols from green tea in each serving of GreenTeaDaily, we provide you with about 45 cups of regular green tea in every GreenTeaDaily stick pack. And based on existing research, if 3 cups of green tea can help burn 80 more calories per day, think about the amount of calories you can burn with a serving of GreenTeaDaily!
Besides, in that case, The Citadel would almost certainly land in the utterly reprehensible, completely despicable play-in game. If The Citadel were to ever make the NCAAs, and the tournament selection committee then put the team in the play-in game, I would immediately drive up to Indianapolis and just start assaulting people.
Such is the case of every person born into this world. Religious man tries to save himself, trying all forms of religions, churches, faiths or denominations. He is lost in si but does not know it. He is “condemned already” according to John3:18but does not know it. He flounders spiritually vainly trying to save himself but only when he comes to the end of himself is he willing to turn to the Lord Jesus Christ by faith ad be saved.
I've been away so long... Well my goal this summer is to blog at least three times a week! We shall see!!
We couldn't get a booth...but we will have a flyer running around for 10% off THIS WEEKEND ONLY (remember we're closed Sunday)
Gillette Venus and Olay Razor: This razor has two Olay moisture bars-one on the top and one on the bottom of the razor. They release a light lather that acts like shaving cream. I like it but its hard to get used to. The moisture bars are a good idea but VERY thick. It makes me feel like I need to press harder because of the two giant bars-which I don’t like. It was nice to be able to try this for free, though!
and you set them a burning.
Gone with the Wind by Margaret Mitchell – 33
And speaking of enjoy.....get ready to enjoy a post from all of our designers today with more amazing projects showing off our new goodies.
FRI. 9/26 and SAT. 9/27 - "THE SUBS" (Better Than Blue's acoustic alter ego) @ the DOCKSIDE in WEST COVINA, 7:30 - 11:30pm. 3057 E. Garvey Ave. North. In the bar area, but you can order food also. All ages ok. Joe Velosa, Danny Hesse, Felicia Bright. Acoustic rock, soul & blues. 626-915-3474.
In Quebec, alternatives to traditional schooling are even less well known than in the rest of North America. I've even heard one friend suggest something along the lines that when the Catholic church lost control of the hearts and minds of Quebecers a few decades ago, school stepped in to fill that space!
So we took her to buy her shoes, had yummy dinner, watched The Muppets movie, and had a sleepover! Super fun, cuddly times. And if you’re keeping score of who owns Toms, it’s Niece-1, Auntie -0. :/
Unfortunately I can't upload images from Ian's blog, but do click on the link above and have a look (if you click on the image itself you'll see a larger version). I also noticed that there will soon be a 35mm kit of one of the Skyships, the Remora - which is definitely something I want to see dangling from my study ceiling on fishing-line before too long.
‘This could be a very rich way to become educated,’ he said.
Held you
The clip adds to the firestorm of debate over the NAACP's decision to approve a resolution at its convention last week accusing some Tea Party activists of racism -- a charge Tea Party leaders deny.
It is said that Nehru was about to resign from the cabinet when Das was killed –– although in the movie Nehru is shown to be waiting by the window, accepting the news of the assassination with the word ‘excellent’. Nehru was definitely losing the policy battle inside the administration –– Das preferred the non-interventionist status quo attitude of the pre-war years, while Ghulam Mohammed (GM) and C Rajagopalachari (CR) opposed most if not all of Nehru’s reformist views. Meanwhile, after the swift military victory in Hyderabad and a successful post-war demobilisation, the charismatic defence minister Subhas Bose became the darling of the media.
Stones
Remove the roasts from the pans, let cool for at least 5 minutes then slice it up and serve.
3. There seems to be a lot of Chicagoness in all this. Never underestimate the power of the Mob to be invisibly legit. Never underestimate its desire for a monopoly. And never understimate the willingness of Newscorp to behave like the cosa nostra – with or without that venerable organisation’s involvement.
The surname Benson kept coming up. She thought, as with many Jews, the name was changed here. That would be logical. My mother’s dad was Joseph Israel. In Russia, he was Josef bin Israel, or Joseph, son of Israel. Rashida Jones found her ancestors in Latvia became Benson in roughly the same way.
AGENT RED: Thanks for joining us, Agent Tall Guy.
'Twill make you so sweet, so perfect and fair,
Should I register my car seat?
To the rescue - The Go with the Flow socks from Favorite Socks. Even though they are featured in the book in a solid color (and look gorgeous in solid colors), I really like how the pattern broke up the colors and gave me jewels for my feet:
One of the homeowners discovered the pit in their backyard around 7am this morning when they let the dog out.
11. Parachute Jump/Jump Five (5:58)
(It’s interesting to note at this point that while he started out talking about someone who thinks it’s irrational to believe in God without sufficient evidence versus someone who thinks that’s fine, he’s now talking in plainer terms of atheist versus theist; that will become key a bit later.)
Cut to the quick by the oft-repeated suggestion that I somehow choose the weekly theme photograph in order to neatly fit in with an old photograph from my collection which I am wanting to feature in my weekly post, I am, this week, eschewing all pretense of theme-following. Instead, I am going with a random photograph taken from one of Uncle Frank's old photographic albums. The photograph is carefully entitled, in Uncle F's neat script, "Father And Mother On Front At Blackpool".
Ornoy A, Dudai M, Sadovsky E. Placental and fetal pathology in infectious mononucleosis. Diagn Gynecol Obstet 1982; 4: 11-16.
Your Mama heard through the Tinseltown real estate gossip grapevine—but can not verify—that Mister Morton has already moved on the purchase of a new house. That's means he's in need of a real estate leprechaun especially since he had terrible luck selling his previous residence, a 1 bedroom condo sold in January of this year (2012) at a million dollar plus loss not counting carrying costs, any improvements or renovations or real estate fees.
As ever, readers' opinions are welcomed.
Me: Uh, no, they're not really his friends. He never talks about them and they aren't especially nice to him. I worry that the kids are making fun of him. I heard one kid say.....
I could probably summarise my views on the validity of the diagnostic criteria with the following: “Many people fantasize about killing their boss but if they actually kill them this would be further evidence of their guilt rather than any diminished responsibility.”
A few of these tests I had never gotten done because I hadn’t really hit my 40′s until I got to Sao Paulo. And then, I just put everything off due to the extra hassle of being in a foreign country. I must say, if I knew what was in store for me, I might have pushed it off even further, so it’s better I went in a bit blind.
Dylan and I have been getting our craft on this week including dying Easter eggs. This was Dylan's first time doing so. I debated with myself for a few weeks whether or not he was old enough. Now I'm very glad I went ahead and bought the kit! We only used half of the colors and 6 eggs, but he had a great time.
Mirel, Jeffrey. “Bridging the ‘Widest Street in the World’: Reflections on the History of Teacher Education.” American Educator, 35.2, Summer 2011.
Before Christmas is over I have some pictures from the recent Christmas Styling Event I presented at for Penny from Working Mums Masterclass. We had a lovely day talking about everything from organising yourself for the silly season, to your Christmas dessert table, favour ideas, a Christmas menu, gift wrapping and how to make your table setting ever so stylish.
Maximum Annual Benefit Payable from a Defined Benefit Plan: This has increased from $195,000 to $200,000.
Carlos Bello was originally sentenced to death after being convicted of first-degree murder in the death of Detective Gerald Rauft in 1981. A change in his sentencing means he will spend life in prison.
*I used salted butter because the salt adds a bit to balance the sweetness. If you use unsalted butter you might add a pinch of sea salt to the crust. I actually added a tiny pinch extra to the crust anyway.
Race Record: Starts: 27; Wins: 7; 2nd: -; 3rd: -; Win & Place Prize Money: £214,199
Method for coffee batter:
Syed Zainal said: “I am not aware of anything. This is a shareholding issue.”
I finally broke down and bought a Scotch Thermal Laminator. I have been dreaming about getting one for the past few months. Several of my co-workers have them, and they absolutely love them. One of my
Now for the cabinets & lighting, I thought this visual from Pottery Barn's "Design Your Own Bathroom" page might help. Sanding and painting the cabinets white and adding new hardware is a pretty simple and low cost update that can be done over a weekend.
but one thing has remained constant.
But Paul was addressing unbelievers and he knew it. How could they be of good cheer? I give you the same answer as before. They could be of good cheer only as they too believed God, Who is the only source of joy? What is your joy and where does it come from?
Healing is a process. And people say that one day you just wake up and forget to remember. And ever since Harry has become someone special to me, I’m forgetting to remember anything that happened before him. And I’m just happy. Completely content. Amazingly sleeping at night again like a healthy person. Like a person who is healed.
Auto-Relay mode.
As we noted Sunday, this means Mr. Paul’s strategy of organizing the grass roots and working arcane delegate selection rules is paying off. And that could mean big trouble for Mitt Romney and his plans to smoothly pivot to a campaign aimed solely at incumbent President Obama.
Later, a man who was known about town as a drunk and who had sunken into an errant life came to my mother's family with his story of change. After the house fire, he had looked among the ruins and found on the fireplace mantle a small Bible, lightly singed but otherwise intact. This discovery caused him to evaluate his life and decide to change. He had given up alcohol, and now reconciled with his family was intent on living a useful life. He thanked my mother's father and returned the Bible which eventually ended up in my mother's possession.
In a word: Aieee! Excited and terrified at once.
Of course, it just wouldn't be right if I didn't run into some kind of problem with a project. Sigh... I cut out the whole dress, smug with myself for getting all the pieces cut with no fabric to spare. But when I carried everything back to the sewing room (I cut on my living room floor) I found, to my horror, that I had dropped the yoke and collar pattern pieces on the floor on my way to the living room and they did not get cut! And I had no more fabric!!! So the next day I made an emergency run back to Walmart, and thankfully they still had plenty of the same denim. I bought another 1/2 yard and pre-washed it and cut those pieces out later that night after work. How I missed them in the first place while I was laying everything out, I don't know. But all's well that ends well, right?
The Director of that facility provides the opening preface
Gun fondue a bomb.
All the plates on the wall were purchased at thrift stores. You can see the inexpensive way I hung them on the wall here.
School of Hard Knocks requires you to return a Warsong Gulch flag, assault a flag in Arathi Basin, assault a tower in Alterac Valley, and cap a flag in Eye of the Storm while you have your orphan out. Be ready to see some odd and quite hilarious battlegrounds while this event runs.
8″ Soft Toe Boots. TR-1 Load bearing orthotic insole. Breathable combat lunar lining. Heel and tow overlays designed to extend wear and life of boots. Low profile sole reduces weight and improves mobility. Vibram IBEX Outsole built for rugged terrain. Deeply serrated heel kicker aids in braking and arresting a slide. Deeply serrated toe bumper aids in vertical climbing and crawling. Rappelling bars extend wear of outsole. Aggressive lace-to-toe style allows for a customized fit.
… I thought tonight at a Monthly Meditation gathering, that the beautiful sound of silence, lasting for twenty minutes, was perfect, because in it, was true peace. In it only my own thoughts could hurt me. In it their were no words, no threats, just peace. I could let go of my worries, my troubled thoughts, and also let go of the happy ones, and simply sit in the empty space, in the silence, in the air, in the breath of God. And the music of Panis Angelicus, and my few but fabulous visits to Cathedrals for Choral Evensong, are somewhat similar. Breathtaking, and no room for argument, in the simple space of complete surrender in beauty…
When Nixon learned about the burglary, he did not act on it prior to his reelection, because he reasoned, rightly, that the Washington Post would blame him for the burglary, although he had nothing to do with it, in the hopes of preventing his reelection.
The North Pacific Gyre is located in the Northern Pacific Ocean and is reputed to be heavily polluted with small particles of plastic garbage, over an area twice as big as the State of Texas.
A metal ruler with a grabby bit in the middle.
This now leads to me and where I am at now. As we have come to our resting place in Clarksboro, NJ. I now reside in the armpit of America and as I write this, I have peace that, for now, the Lord wishes to reveal Himself to me during these two months in a way that will be remarkable. Now equipped with these truths on my belt, I will be awarded with more. And prayerfully, as I continue in obedience and trusting Him, who has called me according to His purpose, that He may be glorified, I will be granted more weapons on my belt, to be ready for every good work. God has done an amazing thing in my life and continually reveals Himself to me in challenging ways, but lovingly provides a path for me to go down. Because of my past, I know where the world leads. Destruction. In my room in El Salvador, I had a picture on my wall, as a constant reminder that was left there. It was a beautiful picture depicting the two paths. One, that leads to destruction. In it, were things of the world. Bars, immorality, the luxuries of this world and at the end of the path, was a flaming pit of darkness and death. And the people on that path were wondering, lost and alone. In darkness. On the contrasting side, was the path that led to heaven. It was narrow, and few followed it. It was difficult. But as they slowly ascended the path, they found their reward, as they entered the gates of heaven, entering into eternal life with God, rather than death and destruction with Satan.
friends triune,
We’ll see in a few days…but if STAR gets the suspensions, will we as journalists, come together and protest in support of their freedom? So many questions, too little answers.
63. Forrest Gump (Tom Hanks) - It seems hokey until I watch it again, fall in love again, cry again.
Who: the family
We went to the park, walked down a road looking for baby goslings and had a great morning. Today is Miss S's last day of testing so I imagine we will be at the park again. Our little Hunter goes in for grooming today as well; he won't be getting a traditional Bichon cut but more of the puppy/teddy bear look. We don't mind him scruffy as long as he doesn't get mats. He has had a few and I brush him every night but find they are really hard to get out. Our Hunter still seems to enjoy the evenings and goes wild; I wish you could see him. He'll do circles around the yard again and again, yet going on a walk seems to tire him out. Of course, going for a walk is really more learning how to behave out in public; so many new sights and sounds. My girlfriend, Kam and her Lexie, didn't join us today and it was such a surprise to me that Hunter was much more timid without her. I know each day will get easier for him; he is such a love!
In the Quantum Physics world, all four of the basic force fields known to current thinkers: gravity, electromagnetism, weak nuclear force and strong nuclear force are in fact different forms of ether/ZPE. We are swimming in it. And, according to newest thinking, its point of emergence into our cosmic Universe is that hole at Galactic Center which we just flew past.
Then I covered the hardboard base with the wadding and some pink gingham which is from one of the duvet covers I made for my eldest when she had a cot bed (now outgrown!). I loved this bit! You're probably supposed to use proper tacks but being impatient me I folded the fabric and hammered in drawing pins to keep it in place. We now have a comfy mattress! And oh yes I discovered it was an Ikea bed so quite a result there :)
When Mr. Goodtime is near, UGPS would say: "Turn left in 3 . . . 2 . . . 1 . . . Right there! Pinch his ass! Not that one. THAT one!"
And then i took a photograph wiz her *we’re just like couple, and everyone who see it, supposed to be jealous wiz us!*. After that i told her what on Aki-P’s mind *based on web information*, and she cried, coz she don’t want to take Acchan’s place as AKB48′s Ace!!!
When I saw this beautiful photograph above the sofa, I just HAD to do some research. A colleague of mine also fell in love, and we just absolutely had to find it. Tonight I did! Via Pinterest (thank you very much for those back links) and here you go.... Photograph by Virginia Macdonald.
***and an afterthought***
A couple of days ago while wandering around blogs, I came across someone mentioning a manga called Arisa by Natsumi Ando. I don’t want to go too in depth about Arisa right now because technically it has nothing to do with this post other than that events occurring while reading Arisa inspired me to write this. What events you ask? One word: CLIFFHANGER!
about where we are right now, not thinking too much about tomorrow.
K is for Kelson - Bibio
I am the sunlight on ripened grain.
WIE: So what you are saying is that from your point of view, which a number of others share, it is somehow obvious that one would have to bring in the idea of a transcendent dimension to really understand this.
How was your day, honey?
tremendous power available (dynamic in its working)”.
Please provide me with your e-mail address where you want the Tutorial sent and PLEASE add me to your safe list so it does not go into your SPAM. It will come to you in a pdf format.
World War II led to the development of a hutted Emergency medical services hospital to the north of the admission unit, which was also requisitioned. Peacetime brought about the creation of the National health service, under which the hospital became known as St. Mary's - named after the Stannington parish church. The hutted emergency hospital was converted to house mental defectives. Limited development under the NHS consisted of a new staff training school and a number of prefabricated units providing social and occupational therapy facilities.
I would then argue that it is not "just an orphan ministry."
Herzog is certainly not a proponent of cockfighting, he even goes to the trouble to buy humanely raised meat and free range chicken for his family, but he does a good job of holding a mirror up to our society's often distorted sense of morality. To his credit, he counts himself among the rest of us when pointing out the flaws in our collective thinking, acknowledging that "human attitudes toward other species are inevitably paradoxical and inconsistent".
Comes with retaining clip and two spade lug connectors
It’s quick, easy and painless. My survey will take approximately 5-10 minutes of your time. Please note that answering the questions is anonymous and no personal data will be saved and used for purposes other than this survey, (no names, etc.)
Anyway, Thursday morning. I got up, and felt much better. I think the flu was gone. Thank goodness! I was SO ready to be done with it. I got the kids off to school, and then CPT came home to get ready to go to work. And I started working on designing. I stopped at 9am, and had 2 1/2 packs designed. Not packaged, but designed. Not too bad. Well, I had one designed from last week. LOL.
What features are you drawn to over and over again?
this little blog of ours is meant to be a sassy little conversation, and i am hoping others want to be friends too!
The list of the kinds of people who may be offended by the words and narrative contained within is long; too long to be included here. A brief overview would likely include feminists, masculinists, liberals, conservatives, vegetarians, vegans, the upper-middle classes, the lower-middle classes, the lower-upper classes, the upper-upper classes, those with a sensitive disposition and most probably anybody with any kind of moral compass.
Thanks for visiting and and I hope everyone has a good week! :)
The vessel was one of two bought by Malaysia in 2002, with both being jointly constructed by DCNS of France and Navantia of Spain.
—Don DeLillo
If you enjoy just relaxing by the pool, walking to the beach, reading a book, and cooking your own meals, a car is not absolutely necessary. I highly recommend renting a car, though. Driving is on the left here, which can be a challenge(that is why I always let my Husband drive). The vistas and views are absolutely stunning! Shopping at Havensite is world-class. St. Thomas is a destination that provides so many things to do,and also the best of relaxing on the beach. We only ate out a few times,but every meal was excellent.
“Hey you!” I say in English. “You number card! You say me! You say me now!”
After the Space Needle today, I went on to the Science Museum in Seattle, only just around the corner. In terms of science museums that I’ve visited, its not the greatest, but still warrants mention for one reason.
Why would Bloomberg and NPR’s news blog report these uncertain results with so much certainty? Did these economists carefully review the report with the methodological considerations in mind? Reflecting on these news articles reminded me of Joel Best’s book, More Damned Lies and Statistics: How Numbers Confuse Public Issues. Best argues that numbers are sometimes used for a particular agenda or misused to gain support for a cause. Media stories often highlight what he refers to as “scary numbers” to make society believe that a problem is severe and has serious implications. According to Best, this tendency to highlight these scary statistics often reflect the way that we notice social problems because they incite fear impelling people to feel vulnerable, as if they are personally impacted by a public issue. Once people feel as if their safety net is threatened, they are more likely to be in support of something being done about it. Perhaps, after reading these articles people will feel that the future of home ownership is bleak. Perhaps, the results of this report—as interpreted by the media—will influence decision-making members of Congress when they convene to vote on the next housing bill. The relationship between data, empirical research, and the media’s use of “scary numbers” can be somewhat contentious, arguably influential.
Why do parents leave their babies to cry it out, but immediately cuddle and console a friend who is upset?
* Color / Saturation
M.J. Rose: I’ve been fascinated with lost fragrances since long before I started writing The Book of Lost Fragrances … since I found a bottle of perfume on my great grandmother’s dresser that had belonged to her mother in Russia. Here is one of those lost fragrances that stirs the senses and the imagination … (researched and described with the help of the perfume writer Dimitrios Dimitriadis)
Three rarities from the seminal Takt label of Japan contributed by Bongohito - over to him to tell you a little more about 'em:
Your voice wanders in ear,
3: SHIRLEY & LEE - Like You Used To Do
Someone found the blog by searching for "barbthefrenchbean!" That's me! Someone fed my pig-headed ego by actually looking for little old moi!
Had takeaway and my colleague said that this chinese fast food chain had awesome taiwanese influenced dishes, so I ordered the fattest ever mei cai qo you (steamed mui choy with pork belly) and I loved it!
I decided to be a bit silly today and write a poem about my youngest child. Though I was going to find something more serious to write. I also thought about another character study. The truth is I'm too tired so a light-hearted, ridiculous poem it is! Enjoy.
This is one of my favored images of myself as an adult. I loved doing this photographic shoot. It was in an ancient log that was hollow and huge, laying on a tiny piece of cloth that was hidden to protect my body from the roughness.
11. Wedding Bell Blues - The 5th Dimension / 2:44
But they couldn't tell by an ultrasound whether they are cancerous or not, so they sent me in to do biopsies.
“You didn’t ask me about all of the feminine arts. You left out painting and drawing.”
Not Little Drama Queen, not Little Miss Drama, and NOT Little Drama GIRL!
The article states that residents in the area complained to URA about parking and traffic woes, hence URA took action by not allowing them to renew their licenses. I suspect that whoever made the complaints must be someone rather important. How else do you explain the mega swift action?! Either that or URA got tired of answering the calls asking them to send enforcement officers to the area.
It’s times like this that chi?dren remember forever. Its t?mes l?ke th?s that cr?ate a bond with nat?re, and p?rents. I have n?ver forgotten ? minute of thi? trip. It happ?ned many years ago, ?nd wa? fo?lowed by m?ny s?lo tri?s, tri?s with m? friend John Hogan, and my sister Charlene. After th?s tri?, m? fath?r w?uld lat?r give m? twenty buck? so I could hit the fi?hing boat? b? myself, or with a friend. That ?s ?hy I sha?e this now. Yo? can never hav? ? bette? time to shar? w?th ?our children than outdoor activities. It’? real im?ortant to spend physical time together in a qua?ity way, sharing and learning together.
Three large potatoes
Travis and I are tackling the connect cards & trying to follow up with each of the families that came. FYI, if you are a family that reaches out to us and we ever drop the ball on getting something to you...Holla at us.
the two cents that you just threw
Until Friday, the circumstances surrounding the shooting that killed Diego Everette and Maurice Skinner during a burglary attempt at 107 Country Club Drive were cloudy at best.
“This is creating a new wave of underwater borrowers,” said Gary Shilling, a veteran financial analyst and well-known housing market bear. “We have all three branches of government trying to keep people in four bedroom houses who can’t afford chicken coops.”
2 nation
García Márquez’s use of hyperbole is an innovative double strategy: on the one hand, his use of fantastical exaggeration is intended to estrange his readers in a Brechtian sense, shocking them out of their complacency and into an ideological re-think. But at the same time, García Márquez amplifies reality, driving home a point by developing it to an almost absurd extent. This often has a satirically debunking effect, highlighting the hypocrisy and stupidity riding a whole herd of sacred cows. For example, the patriarchal machismo of the Buendía family is subverted by Ursula’s almost burlesque performance in the courtroom:
Sugar, White or Brown
“A mysterious man from deep within the mountain region gave this to me,” her father whispered, reaching into his pocket and pulling out a small, round object. His large, callused hand, whose palms had seen many winters and felt the warm soil of each harvest, covered the small gift as he placed it in the soft, delicate palm of his daughter. The princess examined the small toy her father had handed her. How beautiful it was! The sun gleamed upon its face, glinting sparks of daylight upon the golden edge and the intricately carved pattern embossed upon its surface. The princess jumped up, hugging the toy against her chest. Tossing it in the air, the princess skipped away, entranced by the beams of sunlight the ball reflected into the furthest corners of the garden, forgetting to thank her father.
gotten too tall for those cardiac fantasies? And after all,
Prima Eline Pearls
The principle of uniformity holds that “the present if the key to the past.” That is to say that the processes that are in motion today were also in motion in the distant past. There are various reasons why Young Earth Creationists object to this particular geologic principle arguing that it is both inaccurate and untenable; several of their reasons being based on misunderstandings of how this principle is applied in modern geology. Creationist publications from organizations from the Institute for Creation Research (ICR) and Creation Ministries International (CMI) represent the principle of uniformity (uniformitarianism) as a concept that “evolutionists” need. The reasoning behind this is that this principle demands that the earth be much older that 6,000 years, and that nobody would “believe” in Darwinian evolution if the earth were to be believed to be so young.
this built in cabinetry was all white, but i came up with a plan to make the chic city condo a bit more stylish by adding a chocolate brown backing, then a solid chocolate line to the bevels in the doors - much more stylish!
If you complete the challenge don't forget to send me an email at workthatwardrobe@googlemail.com with your blog details.
'C'mon,' FB urged. 'We have to help him. There's loads of us and only 3 of them!'
* Tests and maintains data integrity
“I know,” I said. “But you need something like karate to keep you busy after school.”
loyal customers from my postings...then it kind of
Green gram:1/4 cup,broken
Who hasn't had a spot in their home that never seems to be quite right? You know what I mean....you try different pieces of furniture from around the house, but it just doesn't work the way you envision.
Excellent read, this, one that meshes familiar, terrifying wartime concerns (e.g., the London bombardments, friends and lovers geting killed in battles or bombings) with, as Torres insisted in the Interview, real attachments (romantic and otherwise), and what resulted from the war and those attachments.
And I am completely OK with all of those changes.
1- Gasoline" - 2:57
Now that's not quite the same thing, is it? Hooking of collagen fibres is not the same thing as absorbing or losing water. So off to the first source Wikipedia cites for this info - it's an article in English, apparently in a French journal, but its website is in German. And it's moved. So... follow the link to another German website, which is not looking promising as this the University of Gottingen and the journal was supposed to be from the Université de Bourgogne. Searching finds nothing related. Googling the article title gives the same broken link. Move on...
Since we are a CAS challenge, I couldn't go overboard using a lot
They probably didn't like that he had asked them for money to start a sales call center out of his apartment; to start-up a vending and snacks company (based on the "honor system"); to get his real estate license; to pay the IRS all the money he owed them; to buy himself a Ford escort to replace the giant brown Chrysler he had also been gifted from his grandmother.
“Babe … I think you’re awesome. You’re not like any other girl I’ve dated. Thanks for giving me another chance.” He tilted his head back and downed the drink.
What followed was a really, really long screening. Of the entire evening, I had a few favourites including ‘Some Other Just Ones’ which was a lovely spoken poem over animation ending with a lovely concluding line. ‘Behind the Canvas’ was another interesting film, documenting ‘Outsider Art.’ It could have been a patronizing or othering film concerning those with mental illness, but it was tastefully focused on expressing the artistic nature of the artists without pitying them.
C'mon all children want to live out their stereotypes. Why can't we just offer them the space to do so in the park?
Soak the rice, dal and poha in separate containers for 3-4 hours.
Honey & Chic
He has erected a multitude of New Offices, and sent hither swarms of Officers to harrass our people, and eat out their substance.
The truth is, in coaching I see people run to all sorts of things in a frantic state of “fix it now, and get me out of this mess”. People search longer and harder for remote controls or devices created to entertain themselves harder than they search for the truth. And yet the truth is not hard to find. It’s readily available through prayer and The Bible.
April 11th post update: We are back today with Part II of our "I'll Take Your Word For It" challenge here at Frilly and Funkie. Since it is Week 2, it's time for the Funkie design team to post their take on the challenge. We have a terrific line up and I hope you will take time to stop by the designer's personal blogs and leave them some love.
Happy Writing from The Chipper Writer!
My position on double-jobbing has not changed. I continue to be opposed to this apalling and arrogant practice. If I am elected to the Assembly in May next year, I will give up my job as a barrister. I believe in doing one job full-time and doing it well.
"The show is property of CBS, with or without Charlie Harper, and if you keep the franchise viable, possibly with a star of equal stature as a replacement, you can keep the financial success of your enterprise viable."
I pictured her like a manga heroine, with spiky short hair and a silken silver gown (that may have secret super powers of its own). She’s defiant, she’s adventurous, she’s smart and she’s loyal to her father, but she might not be entirely loyal to the Narrin. But I’m pretty sure she’s got mad kung fu.
Unfortunately, I bought a bunch of really expensive diapers.
Based in New Delhi, India, but originally from the south-western coastal state of Kerala – Padmakumar, or as he simply prefers – Padma, takes a moment to discuss the ‘Enhancing Livelihoods through Knowledge Systems’ (ELKS) programme that he leads.
I chomping at the bit to share more with you, but I see my word count is up. If you would like to have a discussion about this post, feel free to comment below and I’ll get right back with you. (See how I’m building a community?)
Last weekend, Greg and I helped chaperone a Youth outing for our church. We all met at the local Dairy Queen for dinner and then off to the concert/conference downtown. The concert was by Christian Stanfield and he did a really good job ~ and we like the music. But man, we are getting old...I was prepared and took some earplugs. As Emmalyn said "when I looked back at Miss Donna, her ear plugs were glowing a yellow color". The bass was amped up super high on the music. I don't remember the speakers name, but he was really good and seemed to hold most folks attention. There are always attendants to any event that "wander" & can't sit still. And it happened here too. But our kids were all attentive ~ no one wandered off and all seemed to really enjoy themselves. There were probably 17 youth that went from our church and 7 or 8 adults. On the way home, we had 6 younguns piled in the back of our van singing to Greg's new "Go Fish" album he bought. We enjoyed our ride home with Amy, Will, Morgan, Bradley, Emmalyn & Jonathan!
Bag: Chanel
Hair: Medusa – !!Creatives! hair
Language…
At that moment there was another voice at the door.
And AEB and continuous burst is exactly what I used. I adjusted AEB to bracket by two stops for a highly underexposed image and a highly underexposed image.
22 Wives, follow the lead of your husbands as you follow the Lord. 23 The husband is the head of the wife, just as Christ is the head of the church. The church is Christ’s body. He is its Savior. 24 The church follows the lead of Christ. In the same way, wives should follow the lead of their husbands in everything.
…Coming Soon – the story of how I got my name. Story requests are welcome!!!
We do not recommend one keeps oneself completely immersed in reports of the events unfolding on Earth all of the time, as doing so will take your power away as you give it to the terrestrial or extraterrestrial souls you would be continually relying on for our energies and for your view of updates in relation to what the immediate future is going to be like.
"String Cheese does have a stereotypical crowd: people with hula hoops and fairy wings," says Hann of his main band's neon-hippie demographic. "But with EOTO, we don't get caught up in people looking a certain way. If you like to dance, that's the only requirement." - Taken from Pittsburgh City Newspaper interview with Jason Hann
I know, I sound completely insane, right? Like “commit me” insane. But honestly, I am not crazy. Okay, maybe a little bit, and believe me, the first time I saw Bob Marley in my place (technically not my place, not even close to being my place, but I’ll get to that) in the Hollywood hills getting high and singing ‘Buffalo Soldier,’ (sans Janis) I thought I was either dreaming, hallucinating from a bad meal at Denny’s, or, yes, completely nuts. None of that was the case. Bob is a very real, very dead guy who likes to hang out with me, along with a handful of other deceased, famous rock musicians (and a few who never quite made the charts, one of whom I’m currently developing some feelings for. But more about him later, too). So, not only do I hang out with dead rock stars, I also think I am in love with one or, at least, in lust…which makes me totally screwed up. But I am not crazy.
“What? You forget I’m a single dad. The only action I see these days is what Barbie’s giving up to Ken. And let me tell you, that chick is one big prude.”
Bruce Wilson – Vancouver has proved to be a difficult market to break back into, even though it’s my hometown. I have enjoyed the phenomenon of being a medium-size fish in the small pond of Victoria. I have done mainly retail design in Vancouver for the Boboli-MaxMara group. I recently completed a sweet boutique for them downtown called Blubird, a brand new store concept for them. Having said all that, we have a couple of houses under construction in West Point Grey for a developer-friend. With luck, they should open up some possibilities for us.
I think the greatness = success myth grew out of a combination of bio-pic mania and the rags-to-riches fairy tales that Americans are particularly fond of. The myth goes something like this: if you're really good at what you do, someone will come along and "discover" you, make a few phone calls, and before long, you'll be a star.
That’s precisely why, at the University of Rochester, we’re gearing up to study drug administration in adults with this lower level of hypertension. We know it can cause damage, yet many people don’t want to take drugs for these minor elevations – although they really should. We’re hoping to come closer to a solution that fits both their health needs and their busy lifestyles.
There is an eery atmosphere right before a storm, I think I like it!
You are going to need a lot of these, so get ready. Determine your color scheme for your lanterns and then cut your circles in relation to the size of your lantern. Just to put things in perspective, the 16" lantern took about 400 or so 4" felt circles! Yep, that's what I said! And...I started out by tracing a 4" diameter circle and cutting them out by hand, talk about carpel tunnel. By the time I got to my last lantern I wised up and bought a rotary, saved my hand! So, using your rotary, determine the size of circle you want to cut (larger is easier). Set your rotary, pick a location on your felt
Today "Mom to 8" wrote about a conversation she had with her husband. I have quoted parts of it below. I think its a hoot and I can easily see how the conversation would have come about....
She uses a neutral cotton for the sashing and the borders. They're colorful and beautiful, and she usually adds applique' to the borders for an extra special touch. She shared one of her quilts with us last weekend and is was gorgeous. When all her assembly is finished, she usually hand quilts the finished top, making it even more special.
Flavour wise I got a lot of vanilla and clove, banana again, lemon.
They are absolutely beautiful, brand new with faceups by Angeltoast.
Richard G. Catarelli, 47, New York, N.Y.
Of stone
Grief: James and Lorraine Dinnegan with a picture of their son Martin
I like to get lost walking in downtown St. John's and it's easy for me because all I know really is down hill is the water, up hill is the way to the University...that's all I need to know. St. John's is a city for the senses. The smell of the ocean and the working harbour are distinct and familiar. Music wafts from tiny stores, O'Brien's being one of my favourites, but many other stores play traditional tunes.
Years had passed, with seven kids to take care of, feed, guide and discipline, I had learned to love the journey which was like a maze at first. It was not easy. But when you see that your kids, who are replicas of yourself, learn to become independent, rely on themselves , and try to understand that life is not what it seems, you try your best to make things different for them. You become honest, you become real, telling them you are not perfect, and try to give them what you think is best. But most importantly, pray and hope, that their lives would be better than the one that you had.
A chipboard tag book
Another possible breakdown for Career, Creativity, Culture, and Change class would be the following:
It’s not just in some of us; it’s in everyone. And as we let our own light shine, we unconsciously give other people permission to do the same. As we are liberated from our own fear, our presence automatically liberates others.
It was one of the things a couple of the editors told me would have to change for them to take the book: that the shifting POV thing wasn’t working, that I’d have to choose one of the characters and tell the story through his or her eyes. But how can Jessy, messed up as her life is, be expected to tell Roelito’s story? They hardly know each other, and isn’t she busy enough trying to be next on the list of who’ll get beaten up at home? It didn’t make sense to me then, it doesn’t make sense to me today.
of king james and uncle sam
We both had white.The duck scratchings and cheesey prawn crackers more than made up for it.
1.we cover eggs in onion layers
73. Placebo - Daddy Cool (3:21)
Abductions
Back in March (Tuesday 27 March 2012) I got a bunch of cards mostly baseball some of which I will eventually talk about here, but I thought I'd get these two Non-Sport cards out of the way. I got them from Sportlots for 25¢ plus whatever the shipping was. It was two separate one card auctions from the same seller. The subject of War isn't too fun, but the images of these two cards are pretty cool.
It breaks my heart that the pjs meant for Gideon didn’t fit. We ask all of the organizations to let us know the age and size range of the children they help, but sometimes we just don’t have enough of every size. It’s especially hard to have enough of the larger sizes, and sad that this 4-year-old who wears a size 10 wasn’t able to get pjs. Fortunately, books are one-size-fits-all!
Old Winter’s past.
The ribbon, doilie and tag are from my personal stash.
I hope you guys enjoy. And stay tuned next month for e-shop details. Because there's way more than meets the eye. ;)
If you’re guessing that my Dream Job is writing and that I can walk to my writing desk, you would be partially correct. To write well is my Dream, but I do not want it to be my Job. The definition of ‘job,’ to me, involves doing things I don’t love in exchange for money. It is sitting in traffic, parking on the top deck of the garage, attending meetings, being bombarded by ten different conversations in a cube farm when I’m trying to concentrate, cleaning the mess my co-workers leave behind them at the coffee bar, counting down until 5 on Friday. Don’t misunderstand: I have a great job. I work with awesome people, get to spend the majority of my time writing (technical stuff, but still, it’s writing!), and get paid fair compensation that comes with a kick-ass amount of PTO. I’m not bitching about my job. I’m simply saying that it is a Job because it is something I have to do in order to get by in life. It is not what I was born to do. It is not what I’m best at, or even what I love. It is simply a way to exchange my time and my intellect for money.
I have in my heart the laughter you taught me to laugh, so as not to take anything too seriously.
Amounts per salad:
The Dark Knight Rises is Christopher Nolan’s third and final installment of his Batman trilogy, starring Christian Bale (Batman/Bruce Wayne), Anne Hathaway (Selina Kyle/Catwoman), Tom Hardy (Bane), Gary Oldman, Michael Caine, Morgan Freeman, and other Nolan alums Joseph Gordon-Levitt and Marion Cotillard, to be released by Warner Bros. July 2012.
You taste like honey and I thank you.
Four reenactment groups camped at Carnegie Park from a frosty 35-degree Friday night, through a misty, cold and sleeting Saturday. Both Union and Confederate reenactors participated, pitching their tents among the trees.
During litigation, Microsoft submitted allegedly invalidating prior art (in the form of a prior public sale by i4i), which was not considered during prosecution at the USPTO. Microsoft argued that, since the prior art was not considered, the "clear and convincing" standard of proving invalidity was not in play, and that a lower standard of proof should be applied. The district court rejected this argument, as did the Federal Circuit.
3. 3 boxes for just my applique supplies.
So totally not finding anything in GAP Gap, I headed next door to GAPBody - it hurts that they are actually connected. (GAPKids, too, but don't need anything from there yet...)
Guess I should go do that now. I was going to try to get The Bug to nap before school time but she didn't go for it (I did try). Now it's too late & she has to wait until after we drop off Sweet Pea. This is one of the reasons I'm so looking forward to not having to take Sweet Pea to school and pick her up during the summer: The Bug will be able to nap at the time of day that works best for her, and stay asleep when she needs to take a longer nap. None of this waiting to get Sweet Pea to school and having me wake her up to go back to school to pick up her sister.
Big Love Rocket – Love is in the Air (drop – very rare)
“But blessed is the man who trusts in the LORD, whose confidence is in Him.
As large as a grapefruit? A DVD? A softball? Just how big is the record-holding hailstone in Colorado? Colorado State University State Climatologist Nolan Doesken can list at least 18 separate reports of hail stones as large as 4.5 inches in diameter, but few have been officially confirmed.
better and longer life.
helps build a raft
There you have it folks - the so-called journalistic expertise of an advocate of honor killings. You see, Ms. Huus didn't take any time to ponder that the killing of this 20 year old young woman just MIGHT be the work of an adherence to Sharia Law...hell no, she grasped onto this story because she wanted to write a hate piece on Pamela Geller.
Stay tuned for my next post where I battle it out with myself ... do I self pub the sequel? or do I start the query game again? Oh the angst!
When he became a monk he gave up all his books. Shortly before this he had bought a copy of the Corpus iuris and I do not know what else. He returned these to the bookseller. Besides Plautus and Vergil he took nothing with him into the monastery. There the monks gave him a Bible bound in red leather. He made himself so familiar with it that he knew what was on every page, and when some passage was mentioned he knew at once just where it was to be found.
Dim awareness marked time poorly, but suddenly there was a second nothing next to the first. The dividing line was the skin between two pairs of eyes, one flint-grey and hard, the other green but icy cold. Someone knew something about those eyes. They looked a bit like his sister’s.
Decanter of Endless Water: Basicly what it says on the tin. A flask with a never ending supply of water in it. It has 3 different settings with the highest one being at the level that you get knocked down when holding it if not braced and the stream kills small creatures. Basically if your ever on a rowboat forget the paddles, you have a jet boat on your hands.
It feels like full circle. After quite some time, my enthusiam for film making has (unexpectedly) returned. The means of shooting, producing and showing films has changed radically, which I find fascinating as well as exciting. These poetry films and video poems are filmed either on a iPhone 4s or a flip Cam (hardly high-end), but it is amazing what is possible even on this level with mostly daylight, indoor evening hues and a surprisingly cool and versatile editing package (iMovie 09). It’s enough to get creative with, play and show your work. I plan to go bigger. Slightly higher production values for a slicker product.
Taken 05/31/2009
The Advocate General Niilo Jääskinen (‘the AG’) has now provided his opinion on these questions.
I wussed out, for the most part I've just kept the blog focused on some crafts with a tiny bit of my daily life sneaking in. I find that I don't post as often as I'd like because I don't always have a card or project to share and worry that if I posted things like my search for the perfect shade of lipgloss or my love of strudel you guys would be all "what the heck, isn't this a crafting blog? Who cares about her lipgloss or unhealthy strudel obsession... is she going to post a card with strudel on it?" I am humbled and shocked that over 70 people in the world are even interested to see my projects or read my blog in the first place, and I'm terrified that I'll annoy/offend or otherwise drive you guys away and then I'd be all pouty and lonely and really is a lipgloss-less, strudel addicted, exhausted, over-caffeinated, homeschooling mom going to be more attractive if she's all weepy eyed? No... no she's not. So I have kept myself focused on the crafts only.
The Extraordinary Education of Nicholas Benedict
So since I must go get on with it, please check out the lovelies below. They will entertain you if things are quiet around here this weekend, I promise.
By Gardiner Harris More than 80 percent of the active ingredients for drugs sold in the US are made abroad, mostly in a shadowy network of facilities in China and India that are rarely visited by government inspectors, who sometimes can’t even find the …
Oh, and the prices suck too.
Kylie Walker and Melissa Battishall, glow beauty therapy’s dedicated and professional beauty therapists work to give all our clients a personalised experience. We aim to achieve the most effective results, and continue to develop our products and services to maintain this.
Okay guys, just cross your paws on this one.
When it’s hot, I want to wear as little as possible without looking trashy. The key, for me, are sundresses made of breathable fabric that pack a punch of color.
“Behold a dictator”… is what the Italian fascist dictator, Benito Mussolini, had said when he heard that the US Congress had practically delegated it’s authority to then President Franklyn Delano Roosevelt via the National Industrial Recovery Act of 1933. (Because it was the US, where dictatorship was never thought possible, it was largely ignored). Commentators today believe that the Enabling Act (also of 1933) that gave Hitler’s Reich Cabinet untold power was a little more honest… At least they knew what they were doing.
This isn’t half as good as it should be, the whole thing lacks tension and Sigman fails to bring the required emotion to her role as she plods like from scene to scene in a trance-like state.
Pours super-opaque for a beer that's not billed as an RIS or double stout. Great dark tan head, almost as dark as Ten FIDY's, and it stays for a while.
She was announced as the bran's new face back in October, and Ashley Greene just unveiled her DKNY billboard in Times Square on Thursday (December 22).
See how, in general, the attenuation fell over time. As did the gravity. The FG, on the other hand, remained fairly constant. The beer in the recipe has a higher FG than the much stronger 1869 version. The hopping rate fell dramatically at the end of the 19th century, which must have had a big impact on the flavour of the beer.
Having carpentry going at the same time as butchering is keeping us on our toes. Of course, I still have my regular chores to keep up with (laundry and dishes), and I'm wanting to put out a nice lunch for the workers, so I have a couple of chickens roasting in the oven.
This is going to be a really quick post, as we are going to RHS Wisley today to see the Butterflies in the glasshouse, as H has an inset day. Tomorrow after some time of waiting, i'm having an MRI scan done on my right knee to finally find out what's going on, yipee.
What did you particularly like or dislike about the pattern? I like that it had pleats, in addition to the elastic waistline. It made the skirt just a bit fuller and is a great little detail. I also love the pockets!
First up was the epic 3+ hour documentary IT'S THE EARTH, NOT THE MOON. Corvo is a small island in the Azores. In land area, it's a bit smaller than San Francisco, and is home to one village, one street, one airport with one runway, and between 440 and 450 people (population has fluctuated from 300 to 900 over its history.) It's the ideal location for director Goncalo Tocha to spend four years making a documentary about absolutely everything there. The butcher, the fishermen, the cheesemakers, the farmers, the volcanic cone, the beach, the pigs, the cows, the...everything. Divided into chapters that don't have a thematic organization so much as a sense of an evolving story and increasing familiarity with the island, it can be an exhausting project (I admit I checked my watch more than once) but a rewarding one. It really is an exercise in trying to capture everything about a place, and it's undeniably rewarding when Tocha gets his cap at the end and is declared a real man of Corvo. I get the sense that if he could, he would've included all 180 hours he shot there from 2007 to 2011. I wouldn't have stayed around quite that long, but 3 hours was long enough (and, according to Tocha, a half-hour longer than most visitors spend in Corvo)
The noun in this sentence is Jill’s boyfriend. Jill only has one boyfriend, I hope, so the name isn’t vital. What do we do with these types of sentences? We do use commas. Therefore, the correct grammar would be:
Went back home for a couple of days to do some family research and I went to the cemetery where my Father is buried and it got me to thinking about our wonderful family traditions that honor our loved ones that are gone and how we respect their memory.
So yeah...I missed a week and I'm a little late this week, but I've been BUSY!
She does look like she was thinking about throwing that ball when she was overcome by drowsiness. Perhaps she’ll toss it when she awakens. Next up: halfpipe while blindfolded.
Zondag 27 nov. 11.00 -17.00 uur
"Yet, the two parties differ only on means, not ends. While Republicans profess a more abiding faith in a self-regulating economy, Democrats believe carefully tailored state interventions are needed to ensure equal opportunity.
This lovely headboard... Sorry about the bad lighting but I think you can get the idea of how pretty it is anyway. I have a feeling you will be seeing it in an entirely different light in the near future if you know what I mean (que evil laugh) hahaha!! $45
He frowned at my beloved Converse sitting at the corner. "Do you ever wear different shoes?"
These days, Shirley Temple is just a sweet drink, and not a description of my style. I am just not a sweet drink kind of girl. However, I have become partial to a rocked out Saucy Shirley now and then. Usually, I like my Absolut with just a little club soda and a twist of lemon. Silly girly drinks are for other girls, not me. Maybe it's the part of my psyche buried deep inside that wanted those bouncy curls and now craves the sweetness of this kicked up fruity drink. I don't know. I just know it is good. Let's just hope that I don't drink enough of them to curl my hair.
Don't reel me in, to find my dreams are so hollow.
Bar Cookies: Press dough onto bottom of ungreased 13 x 9-inch baking pan. Bake 30 to 35 minutes or until light golden brown. Cool completely in pan on wire rack. Cut into bars. Store tightly covered. 24 BARS.
For the revits on the head, I uses polymer clay rolled in to balls and cut in half an baked about 15 mins. I made soooo many for this costume.
I was lucky enough to know David (or as I called him, Davey) intimately. I used to think of him as a younger brother. I thought I'd share my experiences with him. With you. I mean, the experiences were with him but I'd share them with you. You know what I mean.
The proof was left lying in the way he would quietly clasp her hands when no one would be looking. It was sprinkled across the intent gaze of pure tenderness that Joyce gave Jimmy when he was giving his thank you speech. It was laced in between the spontaneous embraces he would give her, just because. And it was dotted in radiant transparency, when his ear-to-ear smile did not leave his face, from the moment his bride walked down the aisle til the last pair of feet were ushered out that day.
2) Stainless steel or glassware for cooking
He then tells us that non-Christians are “interested bystanders” in this conversation. Their perception of us as violent or non-violent is important to their perception of the Good News we present. Agreed! But need we reinterpret Scripture because of others’ perceptions? Another false dilemma! He returns to this warning at the close of the article.
at his most garish: his naked, peroxidised blonde
So here comes a shipment of precious mother's milk; full of hope, faith, and good old fashioned, perfect-by-design nourishment.
If you have read any of my blog over the last couple years about us and our journey... you have probably already figured that out,I can be very vocal about the craziness of life that we live...due to Rodney being wounded in combat in 2006. There have been many blessings and as well as challenges. We have learned to dance steps to a dance we didn't know and play a game we didn't know the rules to. Dealing with all the processes and powers that be has been the most frustrating situations I could ever have imagined. So from now on in my life I am diagnosing myself allergic to bureaucracy! Which could be interesting since I am going to be a social worker, believe me I am going to try and not be part of the problem.
When Nikolas got home and logged onto his laptop, there was spam, a rather large group e-mail from his friends, and an e-mail from Leonard without a subject. He deleted the spam, read and laughed at his friends’ online antics and then clicked open Leonard’s e-mail. While it loaded, he put on music. Then his phone buzzed. It was a text message from Leonard.
Like soup cans or shoeboxes...the weirder, the better!
I desperately want to watch the TV series, but I want to finish book one first. I may end up just watching the series instead of completing the series in book form. This, however, is not the author’s fault, it’s mine.
“Because I’m not a completely INSANE MORON!!” declared Arik stomping his foot. “I want to leave this besotted cave, and I want to go to Hobbington and have a huge meal of roasted chickens, braised chicken breasts, chicken soup, chicken kabobs, and fresh CHICKEN dumplings!”
"Those two again?! Don't they ever learn?"
Wald Bezt B52-rVp-AA23
251 ***4. “An Introduction to North American Indian Thought.” The Great Ideas Today, vol. 1993, pp. 252-86 (Encyclopedia Britannica, 1993). (Source: Item D-IV/22/1990. Incorporated in Item B-12, above, pp. 223-60 2002).)
The book only lagged for me once when they reach a resistance camp. I think it’s because that’s the only area of the novel where it felt like your standard dystopian fanfare for the oppressed to strategize about how to take down those currently in power. With a book so unique, this scene stuck out to me like a sore thumb, though it’s still manageable and the book does move along to other places.
For the second insert, I used the Words and Photos 6x12 Layered Templates by Ali Edwards (Designer Digitals), slipped into one of the 6x12 page protectors. There were a couple of longer stories from this week that I definitely wanted to remember and this was a great way to capture those memories. I added just a couple of applicable small photos to the top of the template. I slipped a painting Dean did on Friday night into the protector behind the template (and the back side), cutting it down to the right size. LOVE this.
When fermentation happens so does gas, that stuff wants out, help it! Check your kimchi daily, in order to let the gas escape and in order to check its progress.
A 10-year-old Argentine girl was found by Brazilian police seven years after she was kidnapped by her father, authorities said.
Madagascar
"Here's my letter" Rob says.
beyond the alimentary canals
her seat on the bus, Ida B. Wells-Barnett (1862-1928) fought to end discrimination and the terrible crime of lynching and helped found the NAACP, but became known as a difficult woman for her refusal to compromise and was largely lost in the annals of history.
Thinking back on this now, especially in juxtaposition with the WoW changes described in the previous section, one thought keeps returning to us: they would never do this today. When it happened to Diablo players in 1996, we laughed, we said “this game is great,” and we resurrected in town. Some people tried it again, maybe with a friend or two. Others left the door of that square red room firmly shut until they’d gained a few more levels. But for all of these people, it brought the whole game to life. And in the world where any chance of player death is eschewed (it’s all too easy to imagine an executive saying, “if you let the player die, it’s just a chance for him to log out and go back to FarmVille”), a new generation of players are protected from ever having that experience.
. . . Clearly, merely breaching a prior commitment is not enough to constitute an unfair act or practice under Section 5. The standard-setting context in which National made its commitment is critical to the legal analysis. As described above, the lock-in effect resulting from adoption of the NWay patent in the standard and its widespread use are important factors in this case. In addition, the established public policy of supporting efficient standard-setting activities is an important consideration in this case. Similarly, it must be stressed that not all breaches of commitments made by owners of intellectual property during a standard-setting process will constitute an unfair act or practice under Section 5. For example, if the commitment were immaterial to the adoption of the standard or if those practicing the standard could exercise countermeasures to avoid injury from the breach, the statutory requirements most likely would not be met. Finally, it needs to be emphasized that not all departures from those commitments will be treated as a breach. The Orkin court suggested that there might be a distinction between an open-ended commitment and a contract having a fixed duration. That distinction does not apply here because the context of the commitment made it plain that it was for the duration of National’s patents. However, most such commitments, including the one here, are simply to offer the terms specified. Indeed, those principles are reflected in the remedy set forth in the consent decree.
We had some wonderful entries and a lot of them too! :)
what a killer.
-Essays by Joan Didion and others
GREAT IMPRESSIONS HALLOWEEN: WEDNESDAY OCTOBER 5 AT 10A. $15
That rock star of liberal pontificators, Thomas Friedman, has for years been preaching nonviolence to the Palestinians, implying that Israel as a democratic country with a strong moral sensitivity that would yield in the face of such a principled challenge. Yet when something as remarkable as this massive expression of a Palestinian commitment to nonviolent resistance in the form of this open-ended hunger strike, dubbed ‘the war of empty stomachs’, takes place, Friedman along with his liberal brothers is stony silent, and the news sections of the newspaper of the New York Times are unable to find even an inch of space to report on these dramatic protests against Israel’s use of administrative detention and abusive treatment during arrest, interrogation, and imprisonment. Shame on you, Mr. Friedman!
Before them, the Palatine loomed enormous, darkness punctuated with incandescence.
In the mean time, my new iPod Touch (with protective silicone case) is scheduled to arrive on Thursday.
Deirdra: How many beta readers do you have review your manuscript before you send it to your editor?
Now Ben was certain there was trouble. She could be unstable from a mental disorder, or drug abuse. Either way, she was now armed and double the threat.
Last year, I really liked that I was not only celebrating Lent, but doing it in a way that also fulfilled the strongly missional side of me--doing something that helped someone else. It wasn't just giving something up, it was being part of a cause.
Mark Cohen on the Future of China's IP Regime: Mark Cohen, Senior IP attaché at the U.S. Embassy in Beijing will discuss priorities on the protection and enforcement of IP in China for 2007 and beyond. He will also share his views on the significant events of 2006. Most recently interviewed for CNBC, NPR, and featured in the Wall Street Journal, Mark Cohen is the US government's premier expert on China's IP system.-December 14, 2006 2:00pm - 3:30pm EST "Download Here"
I could barely whisper, “You know ‘silk’ is such a cliché,” I touched her slowly along the length of the lips. “But it really is like silk.” Then I tasted her, one long lick against her inverted cunt. “I could eat this thing all day and all night.”
Finally, it was my turn. I really only had to wait about 15 or 20 minutes....to find out I was in the wrong place. I had to go to the MAIN prefecture, downtown. The receptionist kindly wrote down the address, and the room number, where I needed to go. I didn't yell at her. Or pound my fists on the counter. I was excited about having the chance to stand in another line.
The British Freedom Party is proud to be part of this new Europe wide movement of national freedom and democracy, and we are proud to join the struggle against the common enemy we all face as nationalists and patriots. That enemy is the European Union and its political puppets in all the mainstream political parties who do its bidding.
Today, I wonder what it would be like to have a two year old in the mix. I have a picture in my mind of what he would look like as a toddler...dark curly hair, dimpled face, his daddy's eyes...I have a picture in my mind of what he would be getting in to. A picture of him walking or running around...a picture of him throwing his arms around his mama or daddy in a bear hug...a picture of him playing with his brothers and sisters...a picture of him terrorizing his brothers and sisters...a picture of him sitting around the table with his family for dinner...a picture of his adorable first words...a picture is worth a thousand words. A picture in my mind...
In Closing I will say this… There is absolutely Nothing Dry about this Film… Forget the Preview, which is just okay… This Film is Vivid, Visceral and Compelling.
Assange might have learnt his lesson. It is fine to touch politicians. But never touch the bankers.
I email my buddy Kasey
Design plans have started for the new Titanic, which will have the same dimensions as its old version with 840 rooms and nine decks. The new vessel is expected to make its maiden voyage from London to New York in late 2016.
Speculation runs wild. Some take a fairly charitable view: one reviewer sees the exclusion of Plath and Ginsberg as proof that Dove “is her own woman,” bravely going off in her own direction. Facebook has lit up with chatter on the anthology, very little of it positive, at least from what I've seen. It’s been noted that many of the excluded poets publish under HarperCollins imprints, and one source claims that HarperCollins wanted some very steep reprint fees. If this is the case, one wonders whether it might have been a deliberate attempt to torpedo a rival press’ anthology. Some of these issues are touched on in Dove’s introduction, in which she complains about permissions fees. One wonders if this can be the whole story: Penguin is by no means an under-capitalized venture, and people at the press must have known that glaring exclusions like this would seriously hurt the academic market for the book. But what else could explain the exclusions?
THE ROYAL MEWS is historical fiction based on the actual events of
I was interested in finding out why a school failed to get at least one pupil who passed national examinations and the discoveries I made were fascinating. Yes communities may be disadvantaged in terms of resources. However one of the key areas has been addressed-thanks to the donation of text books by UNICEF in conjunction with the Education Ministry. The books however, continue to be condemned by certain people with an agenda that is meant to discredit anything that is perceived to be “Western”. Surely textbooks as a resource in schools are important whether they come from the United Kingdom government just as computers are necessary even if they are a Chinese donation. (But that is something for another time.)
What do you think? Love 'em? Hate 'em? Or... torn because you loved the original ones? Me too. The originals will always have a wonderful place in my heart!
This obscure “spot in the road” is at the junction of SR 80 and FM 81, just 7 miles northeast of Karnes City, TX.
It was a very hot day. But the evening became rather cool with breeze. There was a bonfire in front of the coolie tents. Around that, camp members were relaxing. Shankar was there as well, listening to the coolies’ gossips, while reading the Kenya Morning News. It was a five-day-old newspaper. But it was the only news of the outside world available.
They became rampantly xenophobic to keep their culture from being replaced by the one they conquered.
With the oven rack in the lower third of the oven, preheat the oven to 350 degrees F (325 degrees if using a dark pan).
“Hi. I’m Chris. What do you care about?”
I’m all farked up.
and chiff-chaffs stick
My poetic rhyme is near complete
Stretched
The film features fine performances from Bob Balaban as investigator Elliot Rosen, who is willing to bend the rules to get things done his way, and Wilford Brimley, who surprisingly was playing his first important role in a film despite being 47 at the time. Brimley’s character, a senior prosecutor, is on screen for just one scene that lasts less than fifteen minutes but he makes a huge impression.
For most people all they know about Mandela, prior to his release in 1990, was that he had spent 27 years in prison and was considered by many on the left at the time (and almost everyone now) to be a political prisoner. However, Mandela was no Aung San Suu Kyi, he was not an innocent, democratically elected leader, imprisoned by an authoritarian government.
It was originally thought that 24 girls, aged between 11 and 16 years, were the only victims but more youngsters have since contacted the police alleging they were also victims.
So we have the green factor, using earth friendly ingredients plus we're recycling the empty BBW foaming soap bottles. Pretty decent deal! I made two bottles this morning using Dr. Bronners.
We spent Easter somewhere whose beauty is entirely different to that of green Scotland: Malta, the doughty little island state which is a dot in the centre of the Mediterranean. We went there in search of history, religion and sunshine, and found all three in abundance. Malta is a welcoming, warm-hearted Mediterranean holiday spot, but it is so much more than that, as I’m sure many of you know far better than I. (I know that there are some Maltese who read Dancing Beastie, and I beg your indulgence as I try to recount my first gleanings of your home country.)
Cronulla Beach and township is a major Sutherland Shire drawcard, attracting large tourist numbers every year with its shopping mall, beaches and nightlife. However in 2005, Cronulla was making international headlines for completely different reasons. The Cronulla Race Riots gave Cronulla and the Sutherland Shire a name for racism that seven years later still lingers.
Finally, where’s my cash hand out?
Stop it, don’t throw things at me! I want to get this whole story out, but I don’t want the individual posts to be too long. In other words, I don’t want to take up too much of your time. I want to give you doses and I promise tomorrow’s installment will involve SEX and ridiculousness in some way – maybe even all together. There, now isn’t that worth waiting for? Maybe even better than d*ck pics.
Overall, I enjoyed "Not Buying It", but after a great start, where the author skilfully blended anecdotes of her own life with sociological data on the phenomenon of shopping, it ultimately disappointed me - rather like my own challenge.
So why deny denial? Because in the end, it’s better to embrace grief, to learn to live with the pain (which does diminish, though according to comments left on this blog from others who have also lost their mates, it never goes away completely. It can resurface even years later). By embracing grief, by learning how to cope with it, you can learn how to feel deeply again, look forward to the future, and embrace life. This in no way negates your loss, but allows you to honor his death with your life.
Twenty minutes had passed, and I looked down at my phone and noticed I was receiving a phone call from him.
Wensleydale
Yes, My Disciples, that is indeed the view we kitty’s have when we are inside the Potty Pod 3000. The “right moment” that Brother Oliver waited for to take the photo was just after one of the Guardians of Otis had completely changed out the litter in the box. I, for one, am very glad that Brother Oliver decided to take the tasteful route with this photo. He could have gone a completely different direction and waited until just after Brother Henry had used the box to snap a shot. I’m afraid Brother Henry’s KBADS might have contributed to a more dramatic, but much less pleasing to view, photograph. Kudos to Brother Oliver on his latest artistic triumph!
Cream together butter and sugars. Add molasses, then add egg and mix together thoroughly.
Brett Cross / A Note and a Poem about the Kaipara / 152
This is my latest DT piece for CREATIVE EXPRESSIONS using the Studio 490 Sentimental Art stamps. I also used two corners and a heart from the Studio 490 Artparts.
A few years ago, the city put in coloured bike lanes along a busy street. The reaction has been that these lanes have been a failure. The design did not consider the hoards of taxis that drop off people along the street curb side. Nor was there consideration for drivers who use the lanes to squeeze by other drivers. Nor was there consideration for the motorcyclists crossing the lanes to get to the parking on the shoulder adjacent to the sidewalk.
Now we're ready to make the holes to run the cords and for this we had to run out to Home Depot. We were worried about how we were going to cleanly cut into our walls (they aren't just sheet rock, I think they're called rock lath so they've got at least a 1/2 inch layer of concrete type material in them) and then how to seal the hole around the cords. Thankfully, Aaron found this - the Legrand Wall Grommet Kit for only $20 and all the parts we needed!
I had this experience with The Hours. I couldn’t remember what the hell was going to happen. I had a vague recollection that so and so was going to die, but that was it. The performances were so good (isn’t everything with Meryl Streep?!) that I lost myself entirely all over again.
Next, the "good girl," ultra-feminine, innocent, soft pink A-line:
I used to see Bob at shows all over town but I’ve little memory of him with a camera stuck to his face. He was part of the scene – he loved the music and the players - he didn’t just run off home to bed as soon as he’d nailed a decent shot.
Finally, we wrapped up with The Happy Scientist: Newton's Laws that demonstrates all three laws in one activity. You do not need a subscription to view this particular file, but I highly recommend it. For $20 a year you get a wealth of videos, experiments, and science information. Robert Krampf does a great job, and many of his videos are quite funny as well as interesting and informative. All you need is a bathroom scale--the type with an analog display (digital won't work)--and a heavy object (hand weights work well.) The kids are fascinated with how the scale changes as the weights are rapidly pushed up or pulled down. Simple yet impressive!
2. QUOTE:"Elvis Acevedo gets his hair styled by Mr. London for the first time. Mr. London says he freestyles haircuts and is inspired by clients' personalities." It's one thing if the ghost of Tupac (or even real Anthony Mason) sends you some divine vision of hair landscaping from the afterworld (or Queens) and you decide to make it happen. But just allowing a barber artiste to freestyle what your head is going to look like? Am I overestimating the importance of how one's head looks in real-world-life today? In the Garden of Eden I'm pretty sure it wouldn't matter, so maybe this impulse is natural? Have fun with your hair, it's yours! But is anyone ever better off with a 'cooler' hair design? Who is stoked by this? please encourage anyone like this you encounter to form a facebook group and invite me to it.
Stamp the images in VersaMark and emboss with Heat Tool.
Now onto this week's challenge create a Christmas Card or Project for a Child. Remember you card must have a Nutcrafters image on it to qualify for the prize. To help you along with this Katie and Colette have provided a freebie digi for everyone. This image is part of the Winter Cutie Pie Digi Stamp Collection which you can find here.
So, if you have a friend who is spiritually inclined, I suspect they would really appreciate this book, and I heartily recommend it.
an autopsy on him!
Although I’ve addressed some of the proposed changes in previous post, the following letter does an excellent job summarizing all the changes and addressing their implications.
Dies: Spellbinders Nestabilities Classic Ovals and Labels Twenty-One; Magnolia Leaf, Swirls and Old Swedish Lace doohickeys; Cheery Lynn Designs Exotic Butterfly Small
Yes, I do still draw "old school", with pen and paper, sometimes. Just drew live caricatures at a huge event at Disney last night, actually. But drawing on the iPad and then being able to post to my blog instantly with BlogPost, the app I use for blogging, is just SO easy compared to scanning in paper drawings, that you're probably going to see more and more iPad toons from me here. I am still working on an iPad tutorial, about how I draw on it in ArtStudio, but it's taking more time than I thought to do it correctly.
There is very little opposition that Zimmerman didn’t shoot Trayvon in self-defense, even former governor Jeb Bush has publicly admitted that self-defense is invalid in this case and that he should have been charged by now. We pray, hope, and fight that another case will not be lost to an unjust system.
Across the board it appears that, wherever there is room for indulgence, it has been excessive and unnecessary, the DA said.
Comes with folding wrought iron scroll stand.
Bake the crust for 10 minutes, then transfer it to a rack and let it cool completely before filling.
Hot flashes are a common side effect of chemotherapy for breast, ovary and prostate cancers. Chemotherapy reduces to a minimum the number of estrogens your body needs. Phytoestrogens work by sitting on an unoccupied estrogen receptor until a valid estrogen arrives. It’s kind of like a seat-filler waiting for a paying customer to come along and take the seat. This action of black cohosh relieves some of the symptoms of low estrogen.
I must confess my ignorance here, and I am sure our readers will take me to task for living under a rock, but who is Jeff Goldstein? Charlie Sheen? Should I know these people? Is Charlie Sheen related to Cindy Sheehan? Kinda sounds alike…and I do recognize her name. I know, I know: I need to get out more. But if knowing who these people are requires a TV or reading the MSM, count me out. In that case, ignorance is bliss.
Fixing the lower half of the labor market is a bit more complicated than simply raising income by increasing the minimum wage and expanding the EITC, which are necessary but not sufficient steps. While empirical research has shown that minimum wage increases have no significant impact on employment levels, part of bringing up the bottom of the labor market includes de-casualizing low-wage, insecure, temporary and part-time and replacing them with more secure living wage jobs. In our current political economy, this would be made almost impossible due to the likely eventuality that employers would respond with “increasing productivity” (the modern euphemism for speed-up and stretch-out) and automation, increasing unemployment.
Bulerias A Lebrija/Amparo Bermudez
“Whilst we are definitely not guaranteeing you sales in the thousands or financial success like Billy Hopkins or Graham Taylor, the fact is you never know what you and your writing can achieve unless you try. With most publishers refusing to even look at unsolicited manuscripts and literary agents either increasingly deciding not to take on any new un-published authors or because of the sheer volume of unsolicited manuscripts they are sent each month (over 1,000 per month in some cases) they are simply overloaded, is it any wonder that the Billys and Grahams of this world slip through the net?”
Rigid? God’s not this
My favorite line: Page 197
Similarly, PolitiFact labels "Mostly false" the statement by challenger Judge Charlie Baird who said that "We've had the same leadership in the Travis County DA's office for 30 years." The writer justifies this judgment because Lehmberg didn't ascend to a top leadership position in the DA's Office until 15 years before Ronnie Earle's departure, serving as his first assistant for the final 12 years.
was blocking her lane with his
There’s a section about what to expect at your first appointment. After filling out some paperwork, your consultation with the doctor will begin. “In order to determine what your actual problem is, the doctor will ask you various questions related to your condition,” reads the page. I’m not sure if Dr. Muschik has shared this ground-breaking diagnostic innovation with others in the medical community, but I hope he can write a paper on the topic, perhaps during his extended lunch break. You may be given x-rays and you may receive same-day treatment, if the doctor can figure out which parts of your body to pummel, knead and squeeze. Prior to leaving, you’ll be given home-care instructions that may include ice or heat application and avoidance of certain activities.
Wouldn't it be perfect for a Big Apple Autumn wedding?
Dancekool Students Showcases
Katy Hanna lives in Pennsylvania with her husband and two sons. When she is not spending an inordinate time (7 years) writing her novels, she sews medieval and biblical costumes. The Facebook page for her medieval efforts is here. The pictures of her little one wearing Roman Empire attire reminds me of my little one: I wonder if she tells him its inspired by the Star Wars movie series. My sister made my little one an Obi Wan Kenobi cloak, and it becomes a shepherd's cloak once a year around Christmas time. The commercial site for Ms. Hanna's clothing is here.
Perhaps it’s the case that the Leaf people saw an opportunity to get their name in the newspaper and pounced on it. There’s more than one way to make money off of Andrew Luck’s name, I guess. One just hopes that they pay closer attention to their spelling in their legal documents than they do with their trading cards. Oof. That’s embarrassing. Call more attention to that, Leaf Company.
Well I cant say that spring has really sprung in NYC. I hope that you are luckier than we are. I got this great picture from my friend Dylan Driessen and she really has the right idea. She is making her own spring by painting every nail a different hue. I just love it when you guys get creative. There are times that our nail color should be serious and there are times that we should have a fun happy accessory, right?
The Ar-234 used in the last year of WW2 by the Germans, was an impressively fast machine that was nearly impossible for Allied fighters to intercept (its only defensive weapons were 20mm cannons in the tail – it was assumed it could only be chased!). Only one of 210 built remains today – it is on display at the Smithsonian National Air & Space Museum – Steven F. Udvar-Hazy Center in Chantilly, Virginia USA. I visited this excellent museum in 2010 and was suitably impressed by their collection.
This first phase whittles down the field. Many stop writing after their first piece, they just keep running around shoving it in peoples faces or making them sit and listen as they read the thing. They always talk about the novel they are going to write, although not one single word has hit a page. When these things fail to impress anyone the ‘writer’ fades into nothingness, becoming a call service agent. A rare breed go back to work on their writing skills and return later.
Thanks for stopping by and good luck!!!
But, dang, the food is too good. We’ve been out to eat every day. Tonight, I gotta cook before we turn into roli-polies.
Andrei and I went back to Immigration twice this week. The first time was to argue our case. We got in line at 8:00 in the morning and it wasn't our turn until 6pm. They were taking about 1 person an hour. I was calmer though with A. there and everyone praying for me. I had clarified a few things, but the Inspector still wouldn't accept my new passport. She said I needed some kind of proof that I had changed my name and all the documents matched. We were arguing in circles.
Lee’s towel is not simply an object seeking definition (Kosuth), a device to activate a visual field where representation and objects split from each other (Johns), or perhaps a coded personal reference (Rauschenberg). Instead, Lee’s towel is cleverly all three at once. We might say that Lee’s towel functions somewhere between Johns’ deadpan delivery of iconic visual philosophy in Fool’s House (writing an arrow that labels “this is a towel” and “this is a broom) and all of those mad iconographers running around chasing every splatter, and tracking every drip in a Rauschenberg. The towel is inert (maybe the correct word is limp) and is positioned in such a coy, gentle manner that one feels the object fill up with personality above anything else. Most Lee sculptures have this effect, and to this writer, this effect is both historical and human at once – a good thing!
1) Keep your headline to 5-7 words
IT equipment generates heat, heat ignites paper. Or maybe some philistine army of rodents had gnawed through the cabling, like the knights of the Fourth Crusade who looted and burned the Imperial Library of Constantinople in 1204. Or the Mongol invaders who destroyed Baghdad’s House of Wisdom in 1258 – making the waters of the Tigris ‘run black with ink’. Francis remembers being present in 1981 immediately after the Tamil library at Jaffna, Sri Lanka, had been destroyed by the Singalese in a deliberate act of cultural vandalism. He's hoping that the article in which he recorded his impressions is preserved somewhere in the files of the Guardian.
1½ tsp. salt
Back during the summer, my adorable North Carolina bloggy friend Same Sweet Girl blogged about this new skincare method she was trying called the Oil Cleansing Method. Now I, being a believer in all things natural, was intrigued. However, I had become somewhat of a skincare snob so I bookmarked the blog post and the website and then promptly forgot about it.
'Monetarist fetishists have helped to circulate a pernicious falsehood that the Weimar über-inflation caused the rise of Hitler.'
“The box that you packed clothes in that’s here in the wardrobe?” (Less puzzled, more annoyed simmering dread.)
Who ever saying parenting was easy lied! Not only did they lie boldly but they probably lied with a smile on their face.
Facebook’s planned initial public offering (IPO) is likely to give impetus to China’s social networking service (SNS) and boost its development, industry insiders say. Facebook filed with the US Securities and Exchange Commission on Wednesday to raise …
To protect myself against these types of errors I’m constantly creating mental pastimes that will keep me aware of my setting while in transit. These are especially important for me once I get off the train at Grand Central. Typical I play “What subculture was that business (wo)man in during high school?” or I watch people with headphones on and try to catch them walking to the beat of their music (something I’m often guilty of).
P.S. I will be sure to post something of interest later. I've got quite a few ideas for this little blog now :).
University of QLD Press
We are in trouble no one denies
They have chosen well and have already made
General comment: Think of punchier version of Hakushu 12 with some added sweetness.
Mother: Oh, look at the time! You girls should be off to your writing classes. Professor Rashib must be waiting in the library already.
Tucked into the corner he is staring out at me as I pick my way through the chaos. Waiting for me. Eyes accusing. Perfectly still. The silence is filled with nothing. Not a sound intrudes and with each careful step, I negotiate my way closer. He must have suffered with the damp. I can feel it infesting my lungs with each breath I take. My eyes are flitting around furiously looking for dangers. I stretch my arm, open my fingers and grab his paw. Lucy’s arms around my neck, clutching in joy as we rescue Mr. Ted.
I'll break them down, no mercy shown
